It is difficult to attribute a death to specific weather conditions, but what was clear was that mortality levels were much higher than normal. It is estimated that over two thousand people in Paris had lost their life over the ten day period due to the heat, with the night of the 11th August being the biggest killer. Beyond the sad loss of life though, it was the stories of misery that touched people most.
maybe when I was young, but now
My journey of self-exploration continues. I’ll grow from everything I’ve learned and experienced of late. It’s a good time to be alive. And I keep opening eyes. My own included.
At least a dozen people were killed in storm-related incidents throughout Georgia, Louisiana and Tennessee.
Of course, the three most popular languages in the world are exceptions to the ananas rule. English pineapple, modeled after Spanish piña, is due to the resemblance of the fruit to a pinecone. Originally, pineapple in fact meant 'pinecone', as pĳnappel still does in Dutch. So, a contemporary translation of Linschoten can be:
Anyway, this is an interesting site to poke around on – as you can find out a lot about K12, Inc. as a company (and since they don’t allow much independent research into their activities, it is as good a place as any). I’ve had an entry in draft format for a while now that was designed to look at the corporate side of K12, Inc. and what we can learn from a K-12 online learning perspective by the public information they have to file with shareholders and the SEC. I guess this is why I should probably find some time to complete that entry sooner, rather than later.
You know time is long, and life is short.
Thanks so much to all who entered! We had 74 entries! And again, thanks to my talented & hard working DT for their gorgeous Christmas projects :)
This time was different. On Sunday, in a message posted to its Kindle forum, Amazon gave in, if not entirely graciously. Despite "strong disagreement" with Macmillan, Amazon "will have to capitulate and accept Macmillan's terms because Macmillan has a monopoly over their own titles, and we will want to offer them to you even at prices we believe are needlessly high for e-books." (An interesting use of the word "monopoly," given that Amazon's own pricing policies have been subject to the same accusations.) Amazon goes on to say that "customers will decide for themselves," and that "we know for sure that many independent presses and self-published authors will see this as an opportunity to provide attractively priced e-books as an alternative." (Take that, bad big publishers.)
SPM promotes advocacy supporting a patient’s right to obtain their own data. In a story published today, Patient’s fear of being ‘difficult’ may hurt care, SPM member Hugo Campos writes:
Sen. Greg Ryberg called his subcommittee’s plan for shoring up the state retirement system a “bi-partisan masterpiece” after more than a year of back-and-forth. It received unanimous support from his six-member panel Thursday morning before passing the full Senate Committee with a single “no” vote.
Even with real estate values back to 1980s levels in Japan it is hard to purchase a home with no secure employment. People always point to the low unemployment rate in Japan but this is somewhat misleading. Japan has a giant part-time work force, nearly one third of their entire labor force. These workers operate largely like contractors and surely that cannot be a boost of confidence to take on 40 year mortgage.
everybody has gone.
Khirad: Well, obviously that line of argument was not working on you. You are obsessed with your mother. You Freudian mess up. Do you like mother and bitch in the same sentence?
Dahlia Seed - Please Excuse All the Blood - Full Length Compilation ... Spirit of Orr 1998
Musee des Beaux Arts
In fact, the prisoners do not see each other. Their cells are so blocked off from the rest of the world that the only way that they can communicate to adjacent prison cells is through wall tapping. This is where the narrative can get really entertaining at one time and tense on other times. There’s a simple tapping code that seems to be an unspoken knowledge among the prisoners. It’s so simple that I sometimes find myself tapping random words just to see how good I am. If you want to find that out, read it.
illusions
In this fabulous Ted talk, author Chimamanda Adichie discusses her own experiences with limited stories as a child, and how her own outlook changed and developed as she grew older and discovered other types of books that reflected the diversity of the world around her.
ORTM continues to broadcast mostly pre-recorded programming (i.e., recorded years ago), TM2 has been completely off air since Tuesday morning, and apparently the area around the ORTM compound in Bozola has been completely sealed off by the army. I haven’t seen a journal télévisé since the “counter-coup” on Monday, only occasional “flash infos” like the one below showing Captain Sanogo visiting his troops in Kati who were wounded in the fighting this week.
…unpublished authors everywhereencouraged, no doubt, by self-publishing boosters and outright con artistswho will conclude, on the basis of this retread of a Doris Lessing "experiment," that they might as well just go ahead and self-publish their novels because their judgment is better than that of agents and commercial publishers. I'm in a rather foul mood this morning, so I think I'll just content myself with tearing the conclusions apart instead of the boosters themselves. Today, anyway.
The Chinese government sent time-coded diplomatic briefcases to all major world powers with this information, most to be opened October 13, 2011, around the same time that Nebiru became obvious in the skies.
remember that brown skin gave you humbleness,
Over this past week, we have been having crazy weather from cold to warm back to cold (got of love spring weather). Over this past weekend and Monday; we have been getting summer like weather going as high as 31C/87F (of course the next day it would go back to single digits or the mid 30sF).
Food - I wasn't that hungry.
get sick of them....especially in silk + linen.
I just got back from Ohio. My grandparents have been married for 60 years. That is cause for celebration.
This one was actually a little over 36 inches long, but the nerves kept making it move when stretched. I'd call that a pretty good sized snake. You can't really determine the age of rattlesnakes by the number of buttons, but I counted 11 so its likely a pretty old snake.
capture my song
Most of us aren’t particularly happy about Romney’s nomination. He’s a Massachusetts moderate, the worst kind of establishment Republican. Like it or not, he’s the nominee. He’s won most of the state primaries and caucuses. He earned his victory. Libertarians will do nothing for their cause by trying to create a convention battle. They’ll turn most Republicans, who at their base have a sense of fairness about them, against the libertarians. Nothing will bother the rank and file more than Ron Paul seemingly trying to cheat his way into the nomination. Such a move will reflect poorly not only on Paul but on libertarians as well. They will never be trusted again by the very people libertarians need to recruit if they should ever want to make a serious run at the Republican nomination in the future.
All you have to do is open a 9th Anniversary Celebration Box and you’ll get the leaf:
At the last budget, Mr Osborne said the personal tax allowance would rise by £630 to £8,105 this April. The coalition has pledged as a long-term goal raising the income tax threshold to £10,000, which would enable some 2.2 million people to stop paying tax.
I know that my voice matters. I know that I could have thrived at any of those colleges. I know that I am very good with words. I know that my speech was great. I have a thunder within me that will shake the world.
The image i used is a digi image by Alison Spelman called dress stand. The little part i coloured is done with my Copic markers. The papers i have used come from DCWV "La Creme". The heart shapes are cut out with my Cricut Expression using the cartridge Tags, Bags, Boxes & More. I should be ashamed of myself cause i hardly use my Cricut and i know i could make such good use of it, so shame on me for that! The sentiment stamp i used is one from the Greeting Farm.
Not the season between summer and winter, but rather what leaves do during that season.
Diana has had an interesting and varied career and is very well-known in Jamaica for her activism. I was thrilled that she was happy to come here for a chat, and when you read her answers you'll see that we have been grappling with the same questions in our writing and our lives:
You’ve always been there for me.
Sitting at the corner
At Hamlin House, Colonel Yates hears the howl of a dog, just like the one the night of his and Sir James's visit to the Balfour crypt. Looking out the window, he sees a car approaching. It must be Scotland Yard, he tells Sir James, and not a minute too soon.
Had gathered up some food,
2. Mix 1/2 cup sugar, 1/4 cup butter, and nutmeg in a large bowl. Stir in the milk, then mix in the baking powder and flour until just combined. Fill the prepared mini muffin cups about half full.
After I sanded back the rough cut edges, I applied some stain to all sides (Minwax's Ebony)
Cheering her on
Just got back from a week in San Francisco, a city that is a lot like Austin except someone has secretly put caffeine in everything the populous consumes and tripled the rent on anyone that’s farther right than George McGovern to drive them out. Oh…and has the worst homeless problem in the country, if not the world.
Experts say there are multiple reasons why the law has so rarely been wielded: It is still a relatively new tool; many cases end up in federal court; and trafficking investigations can be difficult to build, especially because of reluctant victims.
That was our problem tonight, so turning to the fridge we had some Pancetta. Pasta is always a store cupboard staple. So together with other things I had to hand, onion, garlic and frozen peas we had:
Let stand at room temperature for 3 to 4 hours. Best if served the same day.
To my mind it makes them normal. Our society, political parties, religious views are full of conflicting compromises that we have make our belief systems simple enough that we can act on them in somewhat useful manner. Most people are not going to be bothered to think through all of the options as a total package synthesis.
Chetan Bhagat’s Revolution 2020 seems like less of a revolution, and more of a love triangle of sorts. This book is to be read only in case of sheer boredom, because if you’re a fan of Aravind Adiga, Vikram Seth or Salman Rushdie, Bhagat’s books are likely to leave you wanting to rip your hair out and then shoot yourself in the head. Why? Because he thinks Indian readers will swallow anything given on a platter to them as “great literature”.
That was my word for yesterday, and so far it fits again today. I am full. Full of sadness, hope, anxiety, joy, pain and love.
Wera was born in 1911. Yesterday, Wera died at the age of 98. She nearly saw her 99th birthday on June 17.
Thank you to everyone who played along with my challenge this week to add stitching to your creation! There were some amazing designs and it was really hard to narrow it down to just a few to highlight.
Confused? Too fucking right.
shaun & i live decently busy lives for two people with no children. shaun's job has seasons of frequent traveling, & since i work with teens, i have lots of sports events & concerts to keep track of. keeping each other informed of what's going on & coming up can be a challenge sometimes. not to mention staying on top of everything casa-related!
Yay, looking at the camera and everything!
This grilled cheese sandwich has since evolved further. There have been times where we have sliced turkey or venison summer sausage in with the apples and it becomes a truly hearty delight. Using artisan breads, special cheeses, or slathering in a cranberry sauce or robust mustard can also elevate the traditional grilled cheese… really, the possibilities are endless. What we have come to really enjoy, however, is prepared as follows:
But the Little Fir Tree was broken-hearted,
This is a monument to all those who died at sea during WW2. See that little speck in the water? That's the Statue of Liberty.
God he’s just all wrong! He’s awful, really. He’s a pig to his girlfriends, he swears and sneers and struts about – and he isn’t even dark (I tend to prefer my pet boys dark and smouldering) If he was an actual pet he’d be a glossy but snarling fancy blonde Afghan hound or something. But, it’s impossible not to fancy him, go on, read it, try and resist…
Though it is pretty safe might a storm materialize. They have the north dakota snowmobile trail for speed. The Speedway schedule starts in May and runs to the north dakota snowmobile trail with prime pheasant hunting. With the north dakota snowmobile trail in southeastern Nebraska. There are also required before licensing is bestowed on aspiring massage therapists. Once you get the north dakota snowmobile trail how to track them down and reclaim them.
I think boredom is to blame as much as anything. I have the boredom threshold of the teeniest tiniest gnat. Gnat-ettes I think they're called. I give up projects, I put down books, I turn off films. Sometimes I'm so boring that my small attention span bores even me. But I'm not bored with blogging yet. Slower yes, but certainly not stopping. And I have no ambitions to grow the blog, or any desire to shrink it. It is what it is. A pleasant diversion.
Then, in the evenings, around 6:30pm, Alex gets home from work, and Toby and I will meet him back at our apartment. And we'll spend an hour together feeding Toby dinner, giving him a splashy bath, reading bedtime stories, or just hanging out on the bed in the nursery.
When you honor your parents they will bless you and the blessing of your parents will take you far. I have said it again and again, I am where I am today; by the grace of God and by the blessings of my mother.
1. Although many Scientologists mistakenly assume that Miscavige was somehow appointed by LRH, in fact that’s not the case. As mentioned in an earlier post, at the 1986 LRH Memorial Event, it was announced that LRH had passed the torch to a couple named Pat and Annie Broeker. In fact, in that event, Miscavige referred to the Broekers as LRH’s “two most trusted friends and companions.” There was an issue about this time, signed by LRH, granting Pat and Annie the rank of Loyal Officers. No mention was made of David Miscavige. Within about a year, Pat Broker had mysteriously disappeared, the LRH issue had vanished, all copies of the event video had been withdrawn, and David Miscavige was in charge. LRH never mentioned Miscavige as a successor, and never mentioned a post called “COB RTC.”
The Gingerbread Simple Syrup (makes enough for 7 lattes)
One Of The Family – Bernard Taylor
If you are interested in this sort of thing, let me know and I could start putting more in the main part of the blog... up to you. Feel free to leave a comment.
In this case, all three of the above can be included as they make up segments of the film. We can also say that Statham played it safe with this film as it stays within the parameters of what we know and expect in his films.
and over the past two years I have made some truly wonderful connections
"First I heard $10K, then I heard that someone had donated $2K on top of it, which I think means they have about $14K with the matching in place. That's a lot of money for them. That's a lot of people being able to call and deal with their rapes with qualified professionals.
* vxvm_END (do not remove)
One of the things I’ve found most interesting about The Voice thus far is their tolerance of allowing acts that are already somewhat established to appear on the show, something that is often considered an unfair advantage on the other shows. Over in the UK, these ‘already established’ artists auditions often turn out to be comical. We had one of the mateys from 90s boyband 5ive appear the other week who laughably failed to impress the judges with his woeful singing voice, and acted as a firm reminder why most of us sure as hell don’t miss 5ive and their cheesy pop ditties. The case that struck me perhaps most significantly, however, was when news broke that Juliet Simms appeared on the US version of the show earlier this year. For those who are unaware, Juliet Simms is the frontwoman of alternative rock band Automatic Loveletter, and has appeared on songs by the likes of Cartel and most famously All Time Low‘s fan-favourite ballad ‘Remembering Sunday’. She is an immense talent with an extraordinary and unique voice that is a far cry from the generic pop diva whine. When she sings a song, you can feel the raw passion coursing through each and every note, and she has been completely understated as a vocalist for quite some time. After her audition was shown on The Voice, millions and millions of people got to witness her absolutely bedazzling rendition of ‘Oh Darling’ by The Beatles (which if you haven’t heard, you can get an earful of below), and the judging panel had nothing but sincere appraisal after listening to her golden voice. She was quite rightly given a place on the show, choosing soul icon Cee-Lo Green as her mentor, and is now in the midst of competing in the elimination rounds of the show.
While AIG is getting death threats by the dozens and they read some of those threats at a congressional hearing today including one to wrap piano wire around their throats and killing their children. On the Neil Cavuto show on Fox News a member of the Democratic leadership (Gary Ackerman) when asked if releasing their names and public information is a responsible thing in light of these threats the copngressman said , “Well all they have to do to avoid this is get back the money.”
Goodwin is the man who was in charge of Royal Bank of Scotland, which was recently bailed out by the taxpayer after posting record losses of £24 billion.
3. Alanna Nash – Elvis and the Colonel
I'm fixing it. Aforementioned massage guy, who works with lots and lots of crazy runners, said something to me the other day that pretty much smacked me in the head. He said (and I can't remember, so I'll paraphrase) that I need to start running as just one thing that I do, not because I'm a runner, but because I'm a healthy person who likes exercise and values being fit. It may be my favorite, but it's not the only thing in my life and it will no longer be the thread that holds my sanity together. He's right. I don't know how it got to that point - holy crap, probably millions of times I've thought back to when I intensely hated the very idea of running, and wondered how the heck I could evolve into a creature so dependent on it. But that's done. Running is a part of the whole picture. Running is something I enjoy. And it's turned into this ugly monster that is fueled by numbers and desperate fights for PR's and training plans. Not that any of those things are bad - they're great in their place. But for me and my brain, running has become much more of a big deal than it should be. It's turned into an obsession that didn't feel unhealthy at all until it was gone and I probably would've sold my soul to the devil for a good 15-miler.
When I arrived I was left in the hands of Robin who immediately set me a few little tasks on some projects that he’s working on. He plans to make some case studies on what people are watching and how that relates to Sky. I looked into Game of Thrones which recently started it’s second series on Sky Atlantic and looked into who watched it, for example, fans of the fantasy genre, LOTR, D&D, as well as where in the world it was watched most. I also made up profiles of Game of Thrones compared to Glee which included age demographics, target audiences, what people who watched the programme were also interested in, etc. It was interesting to see the differences between the two programs.
For the past nine days, I toured around New Zealand with a group of like-minded thrill seekers, and there was nothing we didn’t try – skydiving, conquering the white rapids, hiking slick glaciers and swinging across massive canyons. And now it was now time to face the one thing that made me physically ill at the mere thought of it.
5. If I leave on vacation could someone water the garden?
The glass and mirror walled lift at MCA creates it's own work of art bringing a new perspective to this well photographed area. What a fascinating way to see the earthworks currently outside the old MCA building. The top pic is from Level 1.
Thanks to i86time and the original uploader via dimeadozen for this!
(DON'T TOUCH MY FISHING STUFF!)
It's asparagus season!
Jillian Nicole
more restless....
The idea was to create a cupcake cake with a real working clock.
Dylan: Before the end of the day i want to have at least 100 votes for us on the AMP mag unsigned band contest, and also, I wanna rage mad hard tonight in celebration of this wonderful opportunity AMP has provided us with.
on the floor, all of them looking
There were devastating floods in Bau, Kuching, Sibu and other towns. We can look forward to this again in 2010, and every other year, until we elect a proper government.
I saw him walking toward me,
Not feeling too smart at this moment, so I'll just copy & paste what Wikipedia says about them:
OK I have to go home and make sure he’s safe and sound right now!
Sweet & Pleasant
Horatio has no hope though – Calliope has established as least one rule in her quest for love. CSI need not apply.
In Glenayre Electronics, Inc. v. Jackson, et al. (Fed. Cir. April 11, 2006), the court held that Jackson's acceptance of remittitur damages against Declaratory Judgment plaintiff Glenayre prevented Jackson from litigating indirect infringement counterclaims against Glenayre’s customers. According to Circuit Judge Prost,
Based on the novels I've read so far, you could, I think, accuse James Bond – and possibly Ian Fleming – of being many things: a snob, certainly; a masochist, definitely; a homophobe, potentially; a racist, casually – although again those last two are more a product of their time than an active agenda. But a misogynist? I'm not so sure. If anything, I'd suggest that James Bond is, in fact, an illustrious example of that most unfortunate and ultimately doomed of beasts: the incurable romantic. And it'd be churlish to criticize a man for that.
Here’s a picture of Thor to entice you to go see the damn movie!
Were they all wrong about limiting, balancing, placing checks on government? Were they all wrong about liberty?
Fruits, vegetables, nut and dairy products make a good diabetic diet. Raw vegetables are the excellent choice and can be taken in large amount. Cooked food increase the level of sugar in blood stream when compared with unpeeled and raw food. Cooking of the vegetables destroys most of the enzymes and some minerals and vitamins.
his dream, however he had to wake up.
In the film, it was obvious that Sophie cared about Howl deeply. The moment she was speaking about Howl, she changed back to her real age. Personally, I think that Sophie transforms to her real age, when she stops thinking about herself, or how others will view her. That’s why she changes back when she’s sleeping.
Did I say “never”? Ok, I’ll admit to one teensy-weensy exception; every once in a blue moon, a property comes on the market that seems slightly over-priced ( I said slightly), but it nevertheless gets a deal in the first week or so. That’s your exception. And note that phrase “in the first week or so”.
In Tagalog, right left and straight can be made into verbs. So they can simply “right,” rather than turning right.
I know it's not "me" talking. But it doesn't matter.
determining the application program thread to be in a user operation mode; and
But guess what??!! I’m happy happy smiley here.. Lost my marbles? Possibly. Hehehe.. but I am extra content as I sit here with you all now, because the card I’m posting tonight before I crawl my way into bed, is the very first one I have created – in my brand new craft space – in our brand new home!
So, we must now ban all forms of sun protection. Creams, oils, hats, brollys, the lot
Oh, may Thy grace on us bestow
Seventeen-year-old Pierce Oliviera isn’t dead.
The idea is that once he goes through, the door knows that when that chip is present, the little jib-jab at the bottom of the door which stops it from being able to be opened inwards, drops down with a click and allows the door to swing in, letting the cat in from outside. But…he has to go through it first. To start with, I just opened the door and let him sniff the outside air, hoping that the jungle cat in him would come out and he’d be curious enough to step through the door. Alas, it was the pussy that emerged, which, after a few excited sniffs of the air, decided it was TOO FRIKKIN’ COLD OUT THERE, MOMMY!!! and he dashed back into the house looking a little…confused. This happened a couple of times until I lost patience and decided just to shove him through the door. Not a good idea. All attempts to get him through against his will were met with claws, complaints and an ability to spread-eagle himself most remarkably the closer he got to the door opening. The long walk to freedom continued in this vein until finally an idea arose: if he’s outside in the cold, he’s going to be only too keen to fly through the catflap from the other side to get to the warmth of the house, right?? Right! However, by now he knew something was up and that something was not anything in which he was interested in playing any part. As soon as I picked him up and started making out the back door with him, he started ye olde claws-in-your-soft-bits freak-out (all cat owners know this one) until it was all I could do to throw him back through the catflap into the house. When I came back in, he was sitting on the carpet looking terribly unhappy with me – forget the fact that I was the one with the bloodied arms – BUT the light on the catflap had stopped blinking meaning: SUCCESS!! La porte est ouverte pour Roachford…seulement!
I love people. I need people. Somedays after being around people, I want to crawl in a hole and get away from everyone. Some days, my work makes me feel sad. Part of the sadness is for people who say mean things to me or someone else. More of the sadness is for people who are in shit so deep that neither of us can see a way out. The most sadness I feel is for the people who have given up on life. They don’t want to try anything or go anywhere. They just want to sleep through life and experience as little as possible.
2. Scurrying from Les Abeilles, a boutique selling 40 different types of honey, beeswax candles and other products made by bees, to L'Oisive-Thé, a tea salon where women gather to knit and chat over steaming cups of tea, Nancy peered through the windows and remarked that she would try to return later in the week. All of the interesting boutiques that we had wanted to visit were closed. Of course, they were. It was Monday morning in Paris! Naturally, the Espace Dali that Nancy had proposed to visit was open.
"They" say warm milk can put you to sleep. Really?
I did manage to make these cakepops for M's baby shower for her coworkers though, about a month ago.
Tifferz Take:
Us humans seem to really like dividing the world into “us” vs “them”. It is a simple way of dealing with otherwise complex relationships and I assume that it is a survival mechanism developed in the foggy mists of time when anyone outside of the immediate family/tribe/clan had to be thought of as enemy.
The bottom line is that houses should be bought (or not bought) based on a individualized calculation of its utilitarian value - not as an "investment" to profit from.
And you’re telling me the inside is MORE lavish? Yeah, I’m glad I didn’t go in with my hiking boots and tank top.
In modern music it is the same way. An historian of music – Alfred Frankenstein – wrote a complete history of Western music, and when he came to the 20th century he stopped and said: I cannot write anymore, because what comes from here on is no longer music as I know it. That is, he appreciated that there was something there, but he said it does not obey the laws that music obeyed up until the end of the 19th century; therefore, it is something else; let somebody else write about it. Because, again, some kind of lawlessness, a new principle, entered into life.
Thank you Mat and Monica, I can't wait to see the new lace selection!
Not known even in a file in your head’s shelf
most popular boy in her school. She expects instant execution or some kind
“I’m pretty sure I would remember my best friend telling me he was in love with me.”
3. Fucked Up "Queen of Hearts" 4:36
1) You will need a 3 hole punched sheet of cardstock, plastic negative sheet, scissors, and double-sided tape.
Arrange the deep fried pork and cucumber on a serving dish. Pour the sauce over the deep fried pork and cucumber. Serve while still hot. Best eaten with steamed rice.
I would have told him to wait. But that's just me.
Written by Kloipy (Seth Dombach)
So enough about the weak excuses for my tardiness, what is it that's prompted me to dust off this blog?
Chain (ch) - yarn over and pull through loop.
9 slices Swiss cheese
Frickity, Fracity…C-ARA-ZZZZZZZYYYYY
At least 4 cups of arugula or other bitter greens
But this Tin Woman costume was just a place-holder for what is to come, if my plan succeeds. Before I went to bed that night, the funnel was in the dishwasher, the elastic was back in my stash, the red heart was un-stitched, and the sweater was tossed in the wash. Like my dreamy night of dancing, and like Cindarella's pumpkin coach, it became only a memory.
Please keep these things in mind when shopping sites like Etsy.com, Ebay.com and personal websites. We crafters put our all into our craft. Each design, every piece is a part our personality and we take a lot of time to put it all together.
I liked that Quinn gave another book with Olivia and I’m excited to read about Sebastian who has his own book out. Olivia in the first book was fun to read about as she was pushy. She still is and it plays to her advantage.
I think the cheap soap opera fan in all of us has a secret yearning, half-sleazy, half-romantic, to be a member of a dynasty of wealthy movers and shakers, of patriarchs and grande dames, ambitious young bucks and beautiful, if scheming mademoiselles. We see families like this in great literature and pulp fiction and in TV shows from “Bonanza” to “Dallas.” Even in real life we’re fascinated with business dynasties, like the Vanderbilts and Rockefellers, and political ones, like the Kennedys and Bushes.
Publisher: Discovery House Publishers (December 1, 2011)
Seeing the countless strewn gems and all the strange delight
Please don't think I'm fishing for compliments, I do have terrible self esteem and I do need to do something about my weight too. I was just disappointed as I'd hoped for better photos to share with you.
something in the water
To assemble: Generously frost the cupcakes with Cream Cheese Frosting. Enjoy!
Well, yes, there are still a number of hours before Thing # 1 starts KINDEROHMYGODGARTEN, so I can be calm (HAHHAHA), and take a moment to reflect. In between freaking out. Which I am doing. Right now. See?
McVay lives with her family in the mountains of western North Carolina. Souls of the North Wind is her first novel and may soon become a movie. It’s an exciting adventure story set in the frozen northland and centers around two brave, determined young Inuit boys and their courageous dogs. It’s listed on Amazon.com as juvenile fiction, but Souls is also popular with adults interested in ancient Native American legends and lore. This author also has three powerful short stories on Amazon Shorts and other stories have appeared in many publications. Chrissy has no website, but check her Amazon author’s page at this link: http://www.amazon.com/Chrissy-K.-McVay/e/B002BLUB64/ref=ntt_athr_dp_pel_1
I am thoroughly dreading what they’re going to do with the return of Rose…
Ann Li
I take my inspiration from the local and seasonal color. The sunsets around here are magnificent, I’ve lived in many areas but they are never as dramatic and colorful as they here. The Hudson River and the surrounding mountains present beautiful color combinations year round. I pull these colors into my enamels. The river is peaceful, quiet, and embracing and has inspired generations of artist and designers. I strive to reflect this in my jewelry.
Perhaps another point inherent in the above criticism is a simple denial that either of the two sets of events can in any way be 'seen' as one event. The point to be made in reply is that any event can in principle be infinitely subdivided and we do not have (or need) words for every possible category. If we are dealing with a category for which there is no word, it is not surprising that we might tend to feel that that category is different in type from those for which we do have single words. There is, of course, a reason why we have words for only a few possible categories-a pragmatic reason having at least a great deal to do with frequency of usefulness.
nor what my clothes looked like.
NATO’s top military commander Stavridis had this to say on the subject:
being told to hang my neck like a white goose.
Even if you’re on friendly terms with your ex, or soon-to-be-ex, it’s a good idea to keep your social networking circles as separate as possible. You never know when the emotional tides may turn and readily incriminating evidence found online can be used against you. For example, if you’re not yet divorced, avoid changing your status to “single” and signing up for dating sites. While it may seem like an obvious faux pax, it happens and can be used to prove that a person was cheating, or looking to cheat, prior to divorce proceedings.
This deal making though has helped damn the current health care reform bills in the eyes of many independent voters.
DW: Okay. A couple quick questions just to tie this off.
Below I take the liberty of quoting from a mail correspondence with the coordinator in charge.
It was the second outing for the outfit in recent times. Ever aware of the public purse, the Queen also chose the jolly coat and hat for the first day of her Jubilee tour back in March, when she was accompanied to Leicester by the Duchess of Cambridge – and even accessorised with the same diamond brooch and trusty black bag and shoes.
We were at our first photo shoot today, in downtown Toronto. You may remember six weeks ago when we came for a tour of the iDAPT facilities; well at that time, Toronto Rehab asked Becky if she would donate her photo and story for the purpose of fundraising. They also asked if she would become a Toronto Rehab Ambassador. Of course she agreed. I couldn’t be prouder. So here we were back at Toronto Rehab again. What I didn’t expect, was to be part of it.
The doors open. This is much like how I would imagine going to heaven would be like.
Appellation: Valdadige
My layout is a very different design very roughly based on an idea I saw somewhere on Pinterest, though I totally redsigned it! LOL! I used a number of dies on this card: Cheery Lynn Italian Flourish Doily, Spellbinders Ornate Artisan Tags & Accents, Spellbinders Labels 17 & Labels 8, and a Cuttlebug embossing folder (sorry, I can't remember the name). The base is Bazzill Safari, designer paper is Prima Romantique, brushed God by Recollections, Ivory cs by Gina K. I also had to add a little silk for this 4th anniversary... so the bow is May Arts Silk. I did all the coloring with Copics and finished with Hero Arts Pearls, Gold Cording, Tassle and Trims from my stash, and brads from m stash. Lots of sponging with Adirondak Latte, and the other stamping was done with Memento Ink.
I really do believe that our little ones are gathered above looking down at us with smiles. I hope today wasn't too painful for you all.
Centurion decals on down-tube (left and right), and a Centurion
One of the techs asked, while I was running full speed, 'Can you handle this?'
We read books.
The only down side is the front is a bit floppy. It shows everything when you move so I have mine pinned shut, with the long term plan of sewing in an invisible snap (like this).
I called to book a reservation for a Friday night and they said they were completely booked between the hours of 6pm and 10pm. I decided to go anyway, just to see if they happen to have a table for two. If they didn’t I had a backup. My friend and I arrived at 6:30 expecting a line out the door.
I told myself if I divorced Patrick I could have a child with this other man.
However, at the end of today, something happened which really lifted my spirits. We had a social function at work with our CEO making a few announcements.
Pay.
Radial Arm Saw Basics
Was this not an omen that her sacrifice brought forth nothing but evil!
Once you cross the Greenway, the trail takes on a very different character, full of up-and-down terrain with high bluffs overlooking the lake and a couple of deep ravines. Because of the ravines, the trail takes a circuitous route that alternately goes to the lake and then away from it. This section is the best for anyone wanting to get some exercise, either by trail running or strenuous hiking. Still, even if you’re intent on exercise, you won’t want to miss the lake view at about the 1.5-mile mark. A short trail to the left leads to a point that has a makeshift bench. From there, you can get a view of the lake and the Atlantic & Yadkin Greenway Bridge in the distance.
It had to be delicious, it had to be cutting edge, it had to be age appropriate (hey, I am officially an adult now), it had to be classy, it had to be…me!
By going with two, the Labour Party has left the door open to voters to vote for Glasgow First Candidate and independent both former Labour councillors.
8. Tu Morrow, something of Rob Morrow
NPR recently reported on another one of Camping’s followers, 27-year-old Adrienne Martinez, as saying, “Knowing the date of the end of the world changes all your future plans.”
Missouri
step 3: act like an idiot and forget entirely
A. Lane County Animal Services decides to do a sweep of your neighborhood to look for unlicensed dogs and cats without ID chips. LCAS finds & impounds 48 dogs and 112 cats. About 400 people from your neighborhood go to LCAS to protest this sweep. Assume that protester number includes one owner for each animal impounded. What’s the percentage of people who did not have a pet picked up by the animal patrol but who are protesting (round up to the nearest whole number)?
So let’s get to those winners shall we? and thanks for being so understanding about my internet problems, I was sweating bullets.
"Grandpa, what were you doing in the toilet?"
On that note, I’ll close out the week with a little video from the 90’s. You may remember it as the theme song to a TV show about some chummy people. I choose this because of how my friends have stuck by me through the thick and thin of the past two weeks. I only hope I can return the favor somehow. Enjoy the Rembrandts!
1/4 teaspoon cayenne pepper
As a mama of ten beautiful children, I know there would be no price too high to ransom one of them. No distance too far to travel, no obstacle too great to overcome ~ if my child's life were at stake I would pay any price to rescue them.
I think I have found my new, regular hotspot in the British capital, besides The Wenlock Arms. Both offer sufficient ammunition for most beer hunters, in my opinion.
Lay off the email. You need to better manage your emails. Emails from consumers, possible partners, and suppliers are top priorities and must be answered first. Clients like quick answers to their emails from a real person, even if it is just a brief response saying that their request or question is being worked on.
Serendipity: http://sweetserendipity.wordpress.com/ Cant believe it is almost 4 years since you last wrote! I hope alls well and you get back to blogging soon!
Austin, Texas – Jester King Craft Brewery is set to release a whiskey barrel aged version of Commercial Suicide Oaked Dark Mild. We filled three George Dickel Tennessee Whiskey barrels with Commercial Suicide and let it age. The beer is now ready for release, and we hope to have it in bars beginning this weekend and going into next week.
We're taught we should work hard and save for the future, like for our retirement. If we end up not using all our savings, we can pass them on to our kids and grandkids. This is defined as good behavior; these actions are defined as good deeds. And the laws are structured to support those doing these good deeds.
“So, how much?” Keith ventured.
You were the first, the everything. The hope, the dream, the future. You were something to look forward to, and my reason to burn bridges. You were my go-to, my come-from. The want of you overpowered the logistics of having you, and your absence felt stronger than the presence of any other.
The second book emphasises the critical significance which an understanding of material culture has played in our developing understanding of history. You will look at the way scholars have used the study of objects and their contexts to shed light on a specific period of European history, from about 1200 to 1700. In particular, the focus is on the place of objects in the wider culture of the age and how they illuminate our understanding of religious and intellectual developments during the Reformation and Renaissance. In the first two chapters, you will study the central role that sacred objects played in the everyday lives of Europe’s Catholic population and the extreme reaction to them in Protestant circles, culminating in the mass destruction of much of the material culture of the medieval past during the Reformation. In the final two chapters, you will examine how technical developments in creating objects encouraged new ways of thinking about and understanding the world. This will be through case studies concerned with the origins of the printed book and the preparation of anatomical specimens.
I run because I can. I am ready, willing and able, and the rest is just details. This is enough.
Make sure windows are in.
Court documents show that police have obtained the photos, which were sent between March 30 and April 17.
I’d have feathers and a beak,
And then Ross and Henry came home and we took a million photos! Most of them were a bit blurry - I really need to learn to use our camera properly. I'm just so scared of using the flash, although I guess it's not always terrible.
Mesdan’s gaze drops back down.
Filippo Lauri 1623-1694
There was a short pause. Then Emily crooked her arm, inviting Sylvia to link up with her.
I tried - unsuccessfully - for a martini and ended up with a ginger, basil, vodka combo. Kim & Heather ordered white and black Russians. By then I had given up on any serious cocktail recon and I don't even ask what kind of vodka was in my mediocre mixture. Kim's white Russian, was basically undrinkable. I'm not a white Russian fan myself, but even so, I can tell on tasting one if it's decent or not. This tasted like powdered milk mixed with water and cheap coffee liqueur. (even though the bottle's on the shelf, I really don't think they're using Kahlua)
4 commands
1946: 1032.6 OG (1940s low point, actually after the end of the war)
IT’S ON AGAIN, Dally’s Ozark Fly Fisher Musky Hunt in the wilds of Wisconsin.
If, for some reason, you haven't yet picked up Anna and the French Kiss go and order yourself a copy right now. You'll fall under Perkins' spell within a couple of pages and nothing will get you ready for summer more than the gorgeous story she creates against the beautiful Parisian backdrop.
There are a lot of design patterns and they all are divided into four classes: creational, structural, behavioural, and concurrent.
To start my makeover, I gave the pillow a good base coat on one side only. I was pretty sure it was going to be a total flop, so why waste any more time than I had to? So I painted just one side and let 'er dry. Plus, I didn't want to spend any more time looking at this disgusting piece of fabric than I had to.
It was the summer of 2001. I had never been to a writing conference or seminar. I had never met another author (unless you count my accounting professors, who wrote mind-numbing discourses on the world-changing potential of Balance Sheet ratios and got published in academic periodicals which were probably used as toilet paper more often than reading material). I was, simply put, an idiot when it came to the world of publishing.
Omens are also a way that messages are transmitted to humans other than through the stars and other celestial bodies. There can be political omens, religious omens, economical omens, and so forth. There can also be social and environmental omens. An omen means that there is something being foretold…an event or condition that is being foretold. When an omen appears everyone does not immediately jump into action, of course. But yet in the unconsciousness of every human being, certain omens can be rare enough for all to know that the omen truly means something. In the times you are living in now, you would all benefit by looking for signs in your everyday lives and those on the global stage because we assure you that signs or omens are being made.
Fudgy Cocoa Bites
Mr. Scheve, you see, is himself a former foreign policy aide to none other than Speaker Newt Gingrich in his days as Speaker. While now out on his own and not working for Gingrich, Scheve is considerably conversant with the Gingrich foreign policy record.
So far, I have cooked quinoa in vegetable broth to throw on top of salads, eat with stir fry, and use as a base for a fried egg, salsa, and guacamole hummus.
Here, the upper-half of this image is actually the ceiling, which is painted with an awesome 3D feel, and the lower half is actually a diagonal part of the wall that then connects to the vertical wall below the bottom boarder of the photograph. This painting absolutely blew me away when I looked up at it. The fact that it is even possible to paint such a thing is amazing to think about in itself.
So HI ALL!!!!!! It has been awhile since I have been on here so basically Emmie is getting bigger and stronger and thriving! Love to hear that! She is up to the 95th percentile in weight~!!!!!!! However she is still at the 15th percentile for height. Lol aparently she doesn't have the best genes for height. And now comes the excuse the language bitchy part of this post. I am sick of the FDA mandating what medications our children can and can not take. Emmie used to be on Ultrase MT~12's and we were loving it we never had any problems with her belly, NEVER. When the FDA decided to stick their noses in this stuff and say they are only approving certain enzymes Emmie's belly got all screwed up. We have attempted multiple doses of Creon, and now are attempting multiple doses of Zenpep and still have belly issues. I am sick of it. I WANT ULTRASE BACK. This is ridiculous. Why is CF care so much different from state to state? Why do our children have to suffer because the FDA doesn't want to deal with it? I am soooooooo frustrated. I think I am done venting for the moment but I am sure I will be back soon because I need to start getting this off my chest. It is building and building and I gotta get it out!
F. Roddys 1
tried to reformat my USB and so it did with corrupting it. It gave me a warning that installation cannot proceed because the USB has an error or something. I have
8.black book of hell
The bride and groom are on their honeymoon cruise to Bermuda. Thanks so much for letting me share with you. Maybe after I rest today, I can get back into a more regular crafting schedule. Perhaps there will be a good pic of me with my handsome hubby I can share at a later date. Happy Monday!
This is the main reason many of us have hardened our hearts, so that not only do we not respond to our friends who try to help us, but we also close ourselves off from the very Word of God, which was sent to proclaim the Victory of the Cross and bring us deliverance from the very state we are in!
The lipsticks are what I would call 'vintage sized' and are reminiscent of the smaller lipsticks of yesteryear, which are practical for slipping into a teeny 30s beaded bag (or stuffing down your bra).
Cook the Quorn sausages as per instructions. I pan fried it in about a tsp of oil, tossed it around a bit till the sausages were slightly charred on the outside and cooked through. Drained on paper towels.
* We love home inspection marketing guru Ken Compton. If you’re looking for a bit more reading on how to boost your home inspection biz, check out this piece on increasing your SEO love or this one on establishing yourself as the expert.
Kegged: 05-19-2007
12. Pretty Baby - 1958
While we were interviewing the male, his demeanor was "off" he was verbally rambling, would escalate and de-escalate in somewhat strange behavior, at one point professing his undying love for the female and the very next moment calling her a bitch etc.
Today I got to spend the WHOLE day with a wonderful women....my mommy! We both have been busy with work and with me in school we don't get to see each other as much as we use to. She was sooo kind to take the day off and spend it with me. (thanks!) First stop of the day....the Plaza. We only went to one store because it was too cold and the shopping is all outside. I put together a really cute outfit at H and M. I can't wait to wear it to school!
Asked for evidence of her ancestry to back up the candidate’s past statements, a Warren spokeswoman told TheDC on Monday that the campaign is “working on digging up some sort of evidence to appease” inquirers.
What is it that makes people shy away from the gut wrenching? And I don't mean watching a sad movie or the news. I mean the real grit and dirt of life. What is it that makes people flinch from real things? Things like real love, passion, having babies, death, spirituality, ethics, race, people... the list could go on and on. And it isn't the discussing of these things so much as the living of them. Talk is cheap. (See what I mean about cliches? That is a good one.)
Little Ruffles: b0000, b60 & 0
No larger than a bee, it also acts like one, helping plants reproduce by transferring pollen as it flits from flower to flower sipping nectar. And it flits to a lot of flowers: These birds eat every 10 minutes. They just live life on a different scale. At a different pace.
Huh, what was that? a rumble in the distance, was that thunder? The sun disappears, the sky is getting dark, so we make a dash back home.
Discussing it in class though, and discussing Naomi Klein’s “Baghdad: Year Zero”, really brought back memories about my close friend who goes to West Point (USMA). It’s amazing how two people who were once really close can quickly grow into complete strangers because of differing newly-developed ideologies. Does that even make sense? Is that even a term? I don’t think so. But I hope you get the picture.
In the Pretoria High Court, opponents of the tolling system yesterday scored the first - and crucial - victory in the legal battle to derail the implementation of the controversial scheme.
But it creates hurdles in social settings.
The climax makes apparent that there's an existential, dialectical struggle going on. The star child is engaging in thought experiments on a galactic scale. This is incredibly poignant. The fact that we're given the decision as to how to resolve this thought experiment is also magnificently powerful. The fact that the star child exists introduces an epistemological problem for the player--what's the factual reality about this war against the Reapers? Is it for our survival or something else? What does the star child mean when he says we'll be preserved? Is chaos a moral wrong, as the star child seems to believe it is?
Look at the bible… see if this is true. Take the remarkable young-man Joseph, son of promise, dreamer of dreams… slave, prisoner, sexually harassed, betrayed, over-looked, diminished, but always faithful guy. Joseph seemed somehow to hold onto the dream God gave him as a young man. He trusted in God’s ability to accomplish the dream, not his own ability to make it happen. He must have, to make it through decades of mis-treatment and delay, repeated frustrations and setbacks…all without loosing perspective on who was going to really make his dream become a reality.
You have a plan-- It's okay if you're afraid.
It may seem obvious, but to win at this writing game (get an agent, get a publisher, sell lots of copies and sell another) every advantage offered must be taken and used to the max.
Like when you go to the bathroom due to #1 and your body surprises you with a gigantic #2.
You know what I like? I like it when people shake things up a bit. I like it when someone recognizes that the status quo isn’t quite right and has the compulsion to say something about it. I like having my cage rattled and I like it when I know many other cages are likewise being rattled.
3. Natural Remedy for Headaches and Migraines: Water helps relieve headaches and back pains. These are sometimes caused by dehydration and replenishing your body with water can help. Although there are many other reasons contribute to headaches and migraines, dehydration is the common one.
Of course, it also created a bit of a space void. With an "extra" room in the house, we rearranged a bit and made the master bedroom into a play room. While we're getting things settled, we have a very cushy futon mattress in there that is just perfect for wrestling and bouncing on. That, in and of itself, is fun with a capital "F". But when you add bean bags, pillows, couch cushions, blankets, and every other soft or semi-soft thing in the house, things really take off.
Morrow’s book, Welcome to College: A Christ-follower’s Guide for the Journey (Grand Rapids: Kregel, 2008), is an excellent mix of theological truth and practical application. Morrow covers quite a few theological topics from worldviews, moral relativism, tolerance, the existence of God, and the problem of evil, to practical help like budgets, overcoming “syllabus shock,” dating, sex, and handling death. The chapters are short and easily manageable in one sitting and include helpful summaries for each topic at the end. I loved this aspect of the book, but it comes with a trade-off. The “wide but not deep” approach gives a basic groundwork for all these topics, but those looking for deeper answers will need to look elsewhere for additional resources. Luckily, Morrow includes bibliographic data for “further discovery” to help readers who want that next step. This book would also serve well for a class on the topic who wanted their group to read selected chapters for discussion. (I seriously debated using it for my group but opted not to use a book.)
You may have picked up on it in the evolution section, bit if you didn’t: I am a Christian. I’m a bit of an unconventional Christian though.
….lest the abyss gaze into thee.
- to share with anyone else who wants to know
So, aside from reading, reading and reading more . . . writing, writing and writing more, one thing all of us writers (published authors or aspiring authors) should do is get together with other writers. Great way to do it? Attend a conference like the Unicorn conference on April 28 in Connecticut organized by my agent, or the Horace Greeley Writers’ Conference in October in Poultney, VT. Interested? Check ‘em out.
Me: We're going up before Thanksgiving and we'll be here for Christmas. They'll be alone on Christmas.
4. If you post your entries for my challenges in my challenge group section of Sketches4All Erin Reed's Challenges (I have 2 of them) then each challenge entry will enter you in for 2 more chances each!! Challenges will start Nov 29, 2010. That gets you 4 more entries.
Sounds awesome right? Let me tell you that is CHOCKABLOCK full of tension and will have you rooting for Gene like you wouldn't believe. Gene is human or a Heper as they are known in the world of The Hunt. Basically, we've been reduced to a delicacy and the hunters will stop at nothing to get their hands on us. Some of us are living among the enemy, people like Gene who has had to learn the rules in order to survive. Break one just one time and it's game over. So without further a do, I'm very pleased to present Gene's Top Ten Survival Tips for Hepers:
A conspiracy theorist would have to confront issues of timing. According to a legal filing by the ESDC, the Final Scope of Analysis was expected to be issued by mid-March, but delayed because of the legal wrangle over whether attorney David Paget, who had just advised the developer, could work for the state agency. A conspiracy theorist would have to think that Forest City Ratner welcomed the delay, because otherwise the Final Scope would have been issued before the state budget came to a vote.
Was St. Francis nearly seven feet tall? Probably not. Why did this version of him appear that way? I have absolutely no idea. But I’m always heartened when more than one person sees the same thing.
Just look at Eva Mendes in this strapless Prada gown. That embellished bodice is just stunning! And I like how the colour of the gown compliments her skin. Surprisingly looks great with the red carpet too. Woah. She's got it right. I'm so glad she didn't wear a neck piece and spoil it or anything. Lovely.
One of the stalls was lovely knits & tweed & tartan by Alison (sorry, don't know her last name!) who I regularly meet at craft fairs & I was picking her brain. I've been asked to make some tartan cards to add to the range I supply to Isle of Skye Candles, wonderful smelling shop & they've just won best new Scottish company at the Scottish Variety Awards, brilliant ;) I think this kind of tartan is what they're thinking of, traditional, classic. But how to interpret it in my style? Then I found this what I would call creative tartan (scroll down a bit in the link). Wonderful!
“Some people read for instruction, which is praiseworthy, and some for pleasure, which is innocent, but not a few read from habit, and I suppose that this is neither innocent nor praiseworthy. Of that lamentable company am I. Conversation after a time bores me, games tire me, and my own thoughts, which we are told are the unfailing resource of a sensible man, have a tendency to run dry. Then I’ll fly to my book as the opium-smoker to his pipe. I would sooner read the catalogue of the Army and Navy Stores or Bradshaw’s Guide than nothing at all, and indeed I have spent many delightful hours over both these works.
Thanks to the New Vic, the Met and the Whitney for making my job a bit easier and for providing outstanding services to support the education of all children.
The Personalscrapper Happy New Year's crop was a lot of fun and pretty productive for me! I got 5 of the challenges done. These are two of the layouts I was able to finish, the first one didn't really fit one of the crop challenges but did fit the challenge for week #2 of the 52 week challenges to scrap your family. This is my SIL, brother and nephew at the pumpkin patch last fall! I love this pic of them. I used the October Personalscrapper kit, featuring We R Memory's Autumn Splendor line. Letters are felt Thickers by American Crafts and Basic Grey minis (love these things!). Extras from my stash ( journaling spot by Paper Trunk, flower by We R Memory Keepers, Stickers by We R Memory Keepers (PS Oct. Kit) and calendar cut out by Paper Loft). Layout based on a sketch by Sketchy Thursdays. Sad to say, they are no longer going to be doing weekly sketches. I didn't have a chance to play along with them most of the time, but I always followed along and enjoy their sketches as well as the inspiration from those playing along!
I recently bought Hello Hurricane, and having only listened to it a few times I already love it. Living in the United Kingdom makes it pretty difficult to get music by Switchfoot, since they're not such a big deal over here, but after visiting a Christian Music store, and getting the CD especially ordered I got hold of it - true dedication, yes?
Need more help? Here is a list of a bunch of links about corporal punishment, and why it is unnecessary, ineffective, and harmful to the child and the parent-child relationship.
Essentially taking Eastwood’s western persona and moving it to an urban setting, screenwriter Harry Julian and R.M. Fink (with un-credited help from John Milius) and director Don Siegel clearly want us to view Harry Callahan as the same kind of cool, collected vigilante he played in Leone’s westerns and later in films like High Plains Drifter. In Dirty Harry, violence and revenge is also at the forefront of the film's story while the loner, “man with no name” persona is traded in for the cynical, “justice-at-all-costs” Callahan. Callahan, investigating a rooftop sniper known as Scorpio (a creepy Andrew Robinson who is obviously supposed to resemble the Zodiac killer), grunts and smirks his way through the investigation until he has the carpet pulled out from under him because of his flippant abuse of about four different amendments when he initially captures the Scorpio killer. He isn’t an ambivalent cop; he knows where he stands on the issues and specifically in regards to how differently he goes about doing things compared to the uber-liberals in City Hall, who seemed more concerned about upholding civil liberties and rights to criminals than they do in making sure justice is meted out appropriately. Callahan is disillusioned with the whole cultural shift of the ‘60s (specifically the aforementioned civil rights to criminals), and then, by film's-end, he throws the last remaining symbol that defines him as a cop instead of vigilante into the river.
And you say you've got a man but he's got another plan
Plasma braids:
In 1973, Nixon’s Secretary of Agriculture, Earl Butz, drastically loosened government restrictions on farmers. Farms could now expand, grow, and become massive corporations churning out more corn than ever before (with the help of genetically altered corn, equipment and pesticides increasing yield/acre 400%).
So here are some suggestions in beating the blues when you travel alone :
2 c. raisins or chocolate chips
Up the 104 steps....
Everything happens for a reason.
I thought it would be nice to dress up
“Dead dead. No signals. Not anywhere. Just the one between Judd Filts and XiJign. Satellites up above, talking talking talking to themselves. And me. Say hi?”
As this vote of no confidence goes forward, there is much to be learned and gained. As part of the “war for the soul of our schools,” as allies have branded this struggle, we can’t afford to let down our guard nor let these opportunities slip away.
Great. Cops will show up and no one will be here and I will really look like a dork.
If indeed the Johannine believers were expelled from the synagogue, that event would have rendered them vulnerable to external social and religious pressures. Under Roman law, Jews were exempt from participation in the imperial cult. Following their break with Judaism the Johannine Christians would have been exposed, resulting in an increasingly intensified pressure to participate in the imperial cult. Against this backdrop, Richey argues that the Fourth Gospel, presumably in its final redactional layer, includes a polemic against the Augustan ideology. Specifically, the Johannine polemic is communicated through special vocabulary such as “the Savior of the world” (ho sōtēr tou kosmou; 4:42), and “the Son of God” (ho huios tou theou, 1:34, 49, 3:10; 5:25; 10:36; 11:4, 27; 19:7; 20:31). The attentive audience would have been aware that the use of each phrase affirmed something about Jesus while also making strong counter-imperial assertions. In Rome, the power and titles belonged to Caesar; in John’s Gospel they belong to Jesus.
669 ***D-IV/28/1974. “Some Reservations About the Impeachment of Mr. Nixon.” St. John’s College, Annapolis, Maryland. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 431-39 (1992).)
If you want an even wider spread and more drastic example of discrimination and dispossession- why not look at all the non-muslims suffering under the thumb of Islam?
My Myers Briggs personality profile stuff says that not only am I extremely introverted (go figure huh?) I am also one that does very well with a planned out, methodical way of life. I **LIKE** it that way. I like knowing that I get up, and do the same things at the same times every day (depending upon the day, of course). I have my set time for coffee, when I get dressed, when I brush teeth… I have everything that I do in very set times. Makes it easier when I can stick TO those times, and do things as I should.
Step one: Discover which countries you are visiting and which ones need visa’s. For me it was Russia, China and Vietnam
Next up we'll be sewing our bra back closures. As discussed earlier I'm using a vintage French bra back closure. If you'd like to use one like mine, then you're in luck! My beautiful plush lingerie elastic arrived in the mail and I've been dying to show you what I was planning for it!
Be back on Saturday with the winner!
Six armed men stand outside a log cabin, demanding that the inhabitants exit the premises. Frustrated, the men shoot the cabin to pieces and then storm in to find.... nothing. Standing in the middle of the cabin they uncover a trapdoor in the floor and as they are about to open it, Jonah Hex rains down death from his hiding place in the rafters. The men dead, Hex jumps down into the pools of blood as a man, Chako, crawls out of the trapdoor.
YAY it's Friday!!!
When pressed by his wife he admits to having felt this way for about a year, not that he’s especially forthcoming, and the only explanation he can give for his cooling off towards her is:
Soon we were spending an hour on the phone everyday. We’d go to the coffee shop and she would get tea and I would get coffee. We promptly lost track of time and were gone for much longer than we (or our families) had anticipated. After a few hours I would start getting guilt pangs and say, “I’m getting the guilts. I should go home and make dinner.”
Key Information 13
Not just because of the fun rope swing...but also the soothing aqua color punched up with red accents. I have a blue bedroom, and I love how relaxing and comforting it makes the room feel.
Savitz DA, Brett KM, Dole N, … Male and female occupation in relation to miscarriage and preterm delivery in Central North Carolina. Annals of Epidemiology 1997; 7: 509-517.
(Lord Creator – I’m Wasting Time)
-Don't pretend it didn't happen and don't change the subject when I bring it up. If I say, "Before my baby died..." or "when I was pregnant..." don't get scared. If I'm talking about it, it means I want to. Let me. Pretending it didn't happen will only make me feel utterly alone.
For a second opinion, I sent it to a close friend (who knows me all to well) to read, and give feedback. She loved it (Fear obliterated) but thought there might be some questionable parts (Fear confirmed)…for a moment I thought maybe it was a bad idea, putting myself out there exactly how I am, I was getting ready for a rewrite…when a text arrived from my friend. She said that she had reread it and thought that I shouldn’t change anything! There wasn’t anything questionable, she reevaluated, and she thought it was fabulous! (*sigh*) yes she’s that important to me. Her opinion means a great deal to me as a person and an artist.
That's the thing about writing stories. Once you start putting the words down, the characters take on lives of their own. Well, one of my characters started explaining to another character that the books on the shelf were purchased in the year 3000. How? The librarian visited different periods of history (and the future) to gather books and fill the shelves. Then, come to find out, the people who created the magic library are the grandchildren of the kids visiting the library. Now, despite my aversion to time-travel with all of its loophole possibilities, I sit surrounded by family tree diagrams and lists of books published in certain years, piecing together a story that is really a love letter to my father.
Whew. :)
Walnut Brewery St. James Irish Red
Since then, Patriot has notified 150 other companies that it believes their products infringe its patent, though as yet it has not initiated legal proceedings against them, undoubtedly while it awaits the outcome of its action against Intel.
Wish you all a great weekend!
Boots, Buffalo Exchange
Bugaboo Prize Goes To 52 - Deonna B
Semantic searching is here today, admittedly in its infancy, and I’m eager for the next wave of innovation. I use Apple’s iLife software to organize and search my photos by faces and places. Imagine if this capability extended to broader and more complex searches?
Actually Judy is already a good baker so between copying her movements and listening to the instructor I baked my bread and forgot to take notes. We had to do own washing during the lesson which probably helped keep costs reasonable. There were 2 types of ovens in the studio : one set at 45°C and used mainly for proofing bread dough and the Toshiba ones for baking and even steaming.
Through the unholy power of said 100-year old graveyard toad--plucked at the gang's Stonehenge-ish graveyard hang-out spot--and the tutelage of his family's Satanic butler (a weary post-stroke George Sanders) Tom comes roaring back from the grave, or anyway is able to rise up from his grave on his motorcycle and run down a passing pedestrian on his way to bigger slaughters, all beautifully rendered in bloodless offscreen violence. You would think being covered in dirt and decaying for awhile, possibly even filled with formaldehyde (aye, there's many a hundred-year old froggy's suffered that fate more'n once) his white scarf might at least be weensy bit dirty. Or, were the make-up man to e'er stir from his slumbers, Tom's face might have a ghastly pallor. But this isn't that kind of zombie movie. In fact, without everybody saying so, you'd have no idea Tom has been dead at all or anywhere but to his tailors to get his leather pants tightened.
We consult with small businesses on their social media management. If you need help give us a call.
It’s the belief, the achievement,
The report notes that by 2034, 23 per cent of the population will be over 65, with rising levels of dementia placing additional burdens on care. But “extra resource alone will not help” as some staff are guilty of an “ignominious failure to look beyond a patient’s clinical condition”, and an “apparent indifference” to “appalling standards of care”.
As a science fiction writer, I just couldn't resist dropping a character, Nigerian-born Anika Duncan, into the middle of all that. She's no Lucy Lawless, but she's an ass-kicking warrior in her own right. It makes the whole connection all the more interesting to me...
(4)The production areas of important agricultural products; and
Having been recently told how I drew horribly(and this I know to be true), and then given recompense by being told I probably had some unrefined skill in writing, I found it deeply ironic, and somewhat faintly amusing(in the driest sense), that I just unquestionably, unmistakably, and most assuredly beyond any shadow of doubt, emulated the truth so boldly served.
Alex is in Seattle and enjoying himself when he's not being intimidated by his new super hard job. He had dinner at our friends' house, the friends next to the goddamn house we're trying to buy, where he met some of the neighbors. They tried to Skype with me as a group but they were too inebriated and yelling too loudly for me to help them figure it out.
The sporting revolution, industrial harnesses, my favourite was Topshop’s black leather, Racer back designs, mesh detailing and cut out body con styles. Did someone say Olympics?
This is NOT to say that every family should work this way. This is to say that bed-sharing is what we do, and we are happy with it. Our kids like it. We like it. People should not be embarrassed about it. Experts should not be warning us to "stop it or else." If it works, keep doing it.
Met Commander Shaun Sawyer signalled the complicity of the security services with Muslim extremists when he told the Muslim Safety Forum at the beginning of July this year that security services would focus on “whites.” He knew that in January 2009, the head of domestic security service MI-5 had revealed that 2,000 people in Britain were involved with to Islamist terrorist plots and many more support terrorism through fundraising and propaganda. From September 11, 2001 to the end of March 2008, British authorities arrested 1,471 Muslims for terrorism-related offences.
“Some of its verses make their close friends angry.
4. Hate to See You Go
Imbuing a story with real experiences can be tricky: after all, so much of what we experience may connect us as people, but it’s also usually pretty boring. Some of the first advice you get in writing is to avoid staring with characters waking up, brushing their teeth, or doing anything too mundane or regular. Yet all of us have unique experiences, witness interesting anecdotes as they happen, get a peek into human nature day by day. These are just experiences that relate to character. As I sit here, in the sun, I feel the air warm. I’m sweating. I never sweat in Colorado. There’s a vegetable smell, like something in sweet decay, lacing the air. Just this contrast with the Denver air is an experience I can use for setting. If I wrote about a tropical heat without having felt it myself, it would likely come across as stilted. Obviously, we can’t experience the bite of a vampire or the prick of a killer’s knife (and we wanted to), but we can fill in the gaps. One reason I think the Sookie Stackhouse novels work so well is that they’re firmly grounded in Sookie’s financial troubles. Not a book goes by without her expending a little energy on domestic issues like cleaning. These experiences are universal and help anchor a story. There’s a balance to using these experiences in your work, as there seems to be so often in writing. You want to anchor without boring, captivate without droning on or worse, taking your readers off track. I’ll work on blogging some more while I’m here, but for now I’m off to the beach.
(The names Marion McGill and that of her sister Trudy, are pseudonyms. Marion is a highly respected attorney and college professor, who asked that her real name not be used in this article. All other names in this article are real.)
Further to January Blues
-michelle branch
For more posts about our Harry Potter Party see these links below,
Since he has no real accomplishments to run on, Obama clearly plans on taking the low road. He does not tolerate honest differences, and he will impugn the motives of anyone who dares to disagree with him. Envy of “the rich” and pointing out that rich and old-fashioned Mitt Romney and his stay-at-home wife are simply out of touch with ordinary people, is Obama’s strategy. But that’s not what ordinary people are concerned about.
AKIRA: Hm. What should I do?
That stains her lips red as she changes
Honeybearz Designs (which is me) I will be giving one lucky winner a gift box full of all kinds of crafting supplies and goodies.
So if you are dizzy from that last image, it's okay, I'm going to wrap it up by asking if you would ever do something so bold or so glamorous in your own entrance? Of these images, do you have a favourite? Do share!
I have random telephone numbers which no idea what they go to or random addresses... again, not sure who they belong to.
Actually, what he said was “Damn, Girl! You’re a woman who thinks like a man. You should write a book. Guys everywhere will thank you”.
I’ve interviewed some ex-TM officials and they have informed me that even amongst the examiners only Senior Examiners may examine trademark applications. Mere ‘Examiners’ are Group B officers without a degree in law and are hence not allowed to examine trademark applications. The above statistics may appear bone-chilling but it is still an improvement over the previous year of 2009-10, which has been discussed below:
Under international pressures, Juba announced its intention to withdraw its troops from the area on conditions that neutral international forces would be deployed and that Khartoum should commit itself not to use the area as a base to attack South Sudan. Khartoum immediately rejected the proposal.
Challenge bear
Maybe we both knew the answer.
Last week I wrote that the State must behave in an exemplary fashion. It is also important to know that the State has a responsibility beyond the moral plane. On an entirely practical level, it is clear that the State controls the majority of economic activity in our nation. As such, it is responsible for the majority of construction projects in the country. If we exclude the exceptional projects built for the energy sector, over 75% of the construction in the country is carried out by the State.
The club continues to work to preserve land for birds and other wildlife. In mid-2000’s the club received a substantial bequest from the estate of charter member Rachel Phelps. It donated a portion of that gift to the Town of Wilbraham to acquire land from the Rice Farm to help establish the Rice Nature Preserve on Wilbraham Mountain and another portion to Southwick to help it acquire and preserve land along the Connecticut border.
And whilst there is a great opportunity here for the Church, the opportunity is being missed because the Church (at least here in the West) is itself bound up in our culture’s addiction to the law.
from beneath
In 1880, Eton College decided to undertake a charitable work in Hackney, a poor area. Accordingly, a church mission with a priest was set up, funded by the college. (I bet the poor people of Hackney were really chuffed to have another church.) The mission was at first in makeshift premises but the college was able in due course to raise funds to build a permanent church.
One of the most difficult things about starting a business is to gain clarity about the basics behind your brand. It seems like it should be the easiest thing to do, but it’s where a lot of new solopreneurs (and entrepreneurs in general) struggle. With so many ideas, capabilities, possibilities…how do you narrow down your value proposition to succinctly and clearly develop your brand?
Herbstreit the pundit hasn’t exactly been on a roll lately, either. Maybe this is an olive branch he’s extending to Les Miles in the wake of the Michigan job debacle that Herbie set in motion earlier. Or maybe he’s just jonesing so badly for a USC-Georgia (“two of the hottest teams in the country!”) meeting in the Rose Bowl that he needs an impediment to Georgia playing for the MNC.
Perhaps my biggest complaint about The Hunger Games was the way it was filmed…jerky and amateurish. Yes I understand it for the action sequences, but it was jerky throughout much of the film. It actually gave me a headache before it was done. And if the first movie of the series is almost two and a half hours, how long will they be by the time we get to the final installment?
Format/Info : Audio Coding 3
“They’re gonna do electrical, pipe-fitters, shipfitters. It’s gonna be the gamut of every skill we need,” said Chuck Goddard, President and CEO of Marinette Marine Corporation.
The file reveals a wealth of illuminating and disturbing data on animal disease and death, and their potential, theoretical links to bacteriological warfare and sabotage by enemy nations and individuals.
Santa's elves decide to stay on vacation after Halloween, but Santa needs help on Christmas Eve. Mrs. Claus comes to the rescue by calling on vampire bats to help deliver presents and stuff stockings. Illustrated in colorful, graphic-novel style, this story was inspired by a question the author's young daughter asked him on Christmas morning, "Daddy, how do vampires get their presents if they're up all night?" As he pondered his answer, the idea for this story was born.
I also finally managed to make pozole and have it turn out good. I've tried pozole lots of times and didn't have a good recipe so it didn't turn out right. It's hard to learn to cook things that use ingredients and cooking methods that you are not familiar with. So, as well as renewing my hobby of cooking, I have been traveling via my senses.
The conditioning sounds weird. That story about pulling a flat pint and then a head magically appearing a few seconds later is bizarre. How that could happen, I've no idea. But I guess that it's connected with the wort system of priming.
This divergence of opinion suggests that the extractiveness of different beers may vary, and that whereas one beer may suffer little from contact with this type of timber, others extract therefrom undesirable flavouring substances which give rise to "tainted" or "woody " complaints.
As absurd as they are savage; science or no science,
With Love and Respect
A TV poll marking 40 years since Enochs ‘Rivers of Blood’ speech found most people anticipate racial conflict over the years to come. It is only the unprecedented level of prosperity Europe has enjoyed over recent years that has prevented civil unrest. But we are now heading into recession. In an echo of Enoch’s warnings on racial civil war, The Sunday Times of June 11, 2006 reported that Rear Admiral Chris Parry, one of Britain’s most senior military strategists, warned that western civilisation faces a threat on a par with the barbarian invasions that destroyed the Roman empire. He said future migrations would be comparable to the Goths and Vandals while North African barbary pirates could be attacking yachts and beaches in the Mediterranean within 10 years. Europe, including Britain, could be undermined by large immigrant groups with little allegiance to their host countries, a “reverse colonisation” as Parry described it. These groups would stay connected to their homelands by the internet and cheap flight.
Hear me loud and clear folks. I'm DONE! Not forever, but for now.
I’ll walk through Venice
Reacting to Masing’s comment, PKR vice chairman See Chee How said: “Masing obviously does not respect the constitutional rights of other people to form a political party.
Poor Miss Bella gets so tired after her ballet class. Its hard to believe that this little cutie is causing us such problems with her stubborness and fiery temper right now (my Mum would make some comment here about not knowing where she gets that from and looking me straight in the eye...)
If you really just wanted orange this is the way to go! Or any other color because this seller has several. These are all hand made in a smoke free pet free home so there is nothing to worry about harming your little jelly bean! Great for those surprise gender babies, orange is really coming into style and I'm personally becoming a big fan of it!
He was ribbing me, of course. He understood my good intentions behind the insulting implications. Later that night I laughed and laughed over my gaffe and waited for my golf-ravaged husband to cry out disgustedly, "If you can't be quiet, Shut Up!" He was already asleep, however, and as I listened to that nine-year-old next door bellow out a Katy Perry song, I was left to contemplate the fact that once you tell a parent their kid's art belongs in the bathroom, you can never really take it back.
didn't crawl in and make herself comfy.
New Mexico has dropped Arkansas, Colorado, Delaware, Kansas, Louisiana, Michigan, Ohio, Tennessee, Texas & West Virginia from the list of states they honored.
We are powerless without a road district. We finally are getting tax money to make badly needed improvements. Sadly this recall has to be paid for by the road district. This money for needed repairs will be taken from you. The folks at the beginning of the road have the worst section and will get major work done from money collected from everyone else on Cammann road Anchorage and Wingert streets, Plummers court and Hargens lane. We are in this together. This recall will hurt the road district. It is meant to. I promise to continue to volunteer my time and labor to you. Please vote against the recall.
It's been a really cold night so the fire is going in the family room and I rug up when I come in the lounge to use the computer. So will get on with this post before I freeze, LOL.
After his playing career ended, Ruth was one of the first five players elected into Cooperstown in 1936. He then became the first base coach for the Brooklyn Dodgers in 1938. In 1947, he became director of the American Legion's youth baseball program. On August 16, 1948, Ruth died of pneumonia. He was 53
This brand new release will debut on February 7th, at 8am at The Beer Store (1763 s. 300 w.) The Radio from Hell Show will be broadcasting there show from there all morning.
I managed only 7 layouts which included a couple of photo swaps which I didnt take photos of !!!
The new dynamic text field on the stage in Flash.
“Man, it’s been one of those days,
Peanut Butter, Cinnamon and Raisin Sandwich Balls
Boys:
Wrong. Back to the report:
-Similarly, the registration system for classes is kind of an up-in-the-air ordeal. You basically show up the first day, see if the class interests you and if it is to your liking, you go ahead and sign up. Much different than our months of planning ahead in the states.
Sketch Archives: You can now find all of the past Waltzingmouse Stamp sketches all in one place for those times when you want to jump-start your creativity anytime you are stumped. Take a peek right HERE. It’s a wonderful place to start in you need a little inspiration.
The light turned yellow, just in front of him. He did the right thing, stopping at the crosswalk, even though he could have beaten the red light by accelerating through the intersection.
Don’t give me this whole consumer service thing. Today almost every artist has a healthy web presence and offers at least a free taste or two. You are better off spending your time searching the internet for the music you like than being a lemming to 2010 Music Top Ten Lists of Top Ten Lists.
As i inched my way out of the mass of humanity, looking for the nearest exit, i pondered over the fickleness of the human mind. Show us an image that captivates our imagination and we will exhalt you to a level reserved for angels.
“The Departed” is beyond doubt Martin Scorsese’s best picture for the 2000 decade. Cinematographically, it was appealing and certainly grabs you out of the chair and into the worlds of Costigan and Sullivan. This is certainly the movie that does not romance the idea of organized crime, but brings the realities and truth out of them. “The Departed” deserves to be called a Scorsese masterpiece.
As the two books have developed we know there was more to Ty's involvement than he at first admitted and although he is a witness he might also be charged. The book opens with a chapter I had already read because it was (to me annoyingly) printed at the end of the first book. So I knew that mum, Nicki, has just seen her new boyfriend shot in mistake for her son. The witness protection isn't working too well.
My message is that NO mother on this planet is to be judged to be a better mother because of the dinner she cooked.
Winter Green Farm:
Not only did Parisian tattooist Karl Marc dream up the notion of an interactive tattoo using a QR code, he even found a willing human guinea pig to try the idea out on. The tattooed QR code links to a custom made YouTube video that can be perfectly aligned with the rest of his design.
I would have thought it self-evident that the goal of all sheep farmers would be to raise fat sheep. This is probably why I am an Innkeeper – the sheep business is clearly too intricate for me.
Everyone loves Shindig, an Asheville tradition since 1967. The FREE music series, held at a downtown park, starts July 2 and continues most Saturday nights through Sept. 3. It’s a mix of bluegrass, mountain and old-time music and dance. Expect string bands, clogging, ballads, storytelling. Bring your own instrument — you may not be able to resist some jamming. Add a blanket or chair, a picnic and you’re there.
Last month, Stein was put on notice of a possible violation of the Uniform Code of Justice after he said on Facebook that he would not follow certain orders from the president.Stein’s federal court complaint named his commanding officer, the Secretary of the Navy and the commanding general of the Marine Corps Recruit Depot, where Stein worked as a weather forecaster.
While Jane was sitting behind the beige partition of the bathroom stall, she heard the squeak of a door and the footsteps of someone entering. She expected to hear the squeak of another stall door or at least the water as someone might wash their hands, but instead she was given a few seconds of silence until the same footsteps and the same door squeak as the same someone left. As Jane emerged from her stall she froze before the door closed behind her. On the mirror, written with what appeared to be lipstick, was “See you Friday Punkchick.”
Starting this week there are two series of podcasts which you may like to listen to. I am about to begin a series of 20+ podcasts looking closely at the legal profession in 2011 in the light of the credit crunch, The Legal Services Act and generally through the eyes of sole practitioners, managing partners, barristers, BIG LAW, The Magic Circle and, of course, the regulators. BPP Law School / BPP University College has kindly agreed to sponsor these podcasts to assist with the production and bandwidth costs. I record the first tomorrow with The Naked Lawyer, Chrissie Lightfoot
He said that police
This review is part of Change The Channel’s episode by episode coverage of Laid. The full list of episode reviews can be found under Series.
Education – Life Preparation
Needless to say, I was (and am) an enormous fan of 1979′s The Muppet Movie, which was everything you’d want a Muppet Movie to be and a great deal more. A fictional origin story, exploded with in-jokes and meta-references, and studded with hallucinatory cameos by legendary show biz giants, including Bob Hope, Milton Berle, Edgar Bergen and Charlie McCarthy, Orson Welles, Mel Brooks, Steve Martin, and many others. And full of these great, funny, sentimental songs by Paul Williams — I wore out the grooves of the soundtrack record playing it so much.
Mr. Roofer caught me in a mood which was not one of the most tolerant or forgiving in my arsenal of moods. His comment and manner were not of the variety of friendly interest or in any way complimentary. I stood there resisting putting voice to what had filled my mind. Two words, the last of which was "you!!".
Recently, Sgt and I where out exploring the back roads of Pa, (on a mission to score some bamboo plants that were listed for sale on craigslist) when we ran across a very cool little retro roadside bakery called Dreamville. I don't know about you, but MaryDeluxe could not pass up the opportunity to check out a retro bakery called Dreamville! And of course as long as food is involved, Sgt is completely in. I asked Sgt to snap some pictures with his phone since I unfortunately left mine at home, and he also agreed to do a little write up of Dreamville for my blog post! Perhaps "Sgt's Roadside Eats" will become a regular feature here on DeluxeVille?
Please tell me about yourself, your academic plans, about the program you are attending and the courses you are taking and plan to take in the future.
information as well. This kit doesn't stop there though
"Even with a revising chamber, the legislation emanating from Westminster is regularly subjected to scathing judicial criticism. Is there any evidence at all that the standard of Scottish Parliament legislation is lower than that of Westminster legislation?"
Will it clear up the future for me? Perhaps. At the very least, it will help me face the future. Whatever that might be.
I was fortunate to have a downstairs bath room, so I led him in and switched on the shower. As soon as I shut the door he began to shake, his legs wobbling so that his claws made tiny tap-tap noises on the tiles. He watched me with big brown eyes as I checked the temperature and retrieved and old towel and some baby shampoo from the cupboard – left over from when I had babysat my niece.
The next morning we learned that snow had closed the road we wanted to take south through the park, so we decided to take a side trip on Chief Joseph Scenic Byway to Cody, Wyoming. The scenic byway was totally socked in with fog, snow, hoarfrost and more fog. It took a long time to get over the mountains and below the clouds, then we found ourselves at a beautiful canyon, outside of Cody. We got there in time for a late lunch in the historic Irma Hotel, took a trolly tour, sat outside the hotel for a shootout and spent the evening listening to music at the cowboy review in the old theater. The art museum I had hoped to visit was closed, so we spent hours the next morning visiting the Buffalo Bill Museum. It was great! The collections were extensive and the exhibits so well done. The garden there was lovely and peaceful. After lunch at the museum, we drove back to Yellowstone through the East Entrance. It had been sprinkly and overcast most of the day and as we approached Yellowstone Lake, the clouds started breaking up and lifting.
Before I was born, neither of my parents had ever even considered homeschooling. It just never entered their minds. But my mom was, and still is, a hippie, so she did plan to breastfeed. Because of that, she joined the Le Leche Leauge when I was born (or possibly before I was born... I don't know how those things works! :-P). Now, my mom had plenty of gentle discipline, unconditional parenting, type books, I was never let to cry, lived in a sling for ages, and all those other attachment parenting practices (she never used that term, though I don't know why she didn't... She must have seen it used in all those books she read!) so she was the type who liked to keep her kids close, and be involved in their life.
Feeling emotionally tired as I think of ending the school year ... I will definitely miss my students. Two and half months back home seems like a long time to be away from them, but then I know that the time will fly by and I'll be missing "home" life once again. Leaving is bittersweet. I can't wait to get back to the things that are familiar, but will miss all the things that I've worked so hard at that have become familiar here. Trying to be rooted and built up in God, established in the faith that He is working all things according to His purpose and for His glory. When my affections are bound up in Him, then no matter where I go or what I am doing, as long as it is with Him, I will have all my joy and happiness. So then the goal must be, to "live to the hilt every situation I believe to be the will of God" (Jim Elliot).
Favorite quote from a movie?
There was something different about all this, though. I immersed myself, but all the while I was picking up the rudimentaries of right and wrong, of the value of life. Of love for others. And after all, while my friends were totally obsessed with football, I couldn't help feeling a bit sorry for them. They watched 22 men in shorts kick a ball around while I loved cricket and watched an eccentric, clever and funny man help up scantily-clad women while he was saving the earth. Sigh.
I want to offer support and validation. Or just a listening heart. When you reach out to me, I want to reach back. I want you to know that you are heard. That you matter. That your pain matters.
1. Your company’s reporter relationships
The WORD says… Fix your attention on God who supplies life’s needs (Matthew 6).
Compared to the total number of activities other kids do I feel that my kids do a smaller quantity of things. Due to the long distance move this academic year what each person in our family does with our time has shifted. However even doing a small number of activities with formal organizations, it is difficult to do any one thing completely, what I'd call doing a thing well and thoroughly. It didn't seem to be this hard in the past. I don't know if the change is due to everything getting more intense and adding hours per activity or expanding the scope or if it is just typical change that happens when kids get older and their activities become more intense.
If you plan on attending this hop, please leave a comment below, and share this post on your Facebook, Twitter, and Pinterest to help it grow.
More fun random items. This was pretty much the sight everywhere you turn. Booth after booth of random stuff. After awhile, it all started to look the same. But I went through twice anyway because I was totally in a happy place....
I am reminded that although I like puppies I don’t want to have one everyday..luckily I can just go to the neighbors and play with theirs:)
This neighborhood is about ten minutes from my house.
THEN GET THEM OUT OF YOUR BRAIN BEFORE THOSE WORDS TURN YOUR BRAIN INTO SHIT SOUP!
- I remember that, Dirty Jude. I remember looking up at you. You had black fishnet stockings on. I could see right up your skirt.
I know I have improved my diet and reduced my alcohol intake to less than recommended, so thanks, but now I feel a little like I’m going too far – Sprouting kits, smoothies, soya milk, fresh juice, spirilina. Yet yesterday I ate so much food! I had twice as much as usual. Today I shat for ages. Twice for ages. Clearly it’s going straight out the other end.
WDW sweetheart Rose to DMC 316---am using DMC 210 (the 316 caused the "E" in love to get lost so I chose a lighter purple)
One of life’s most notoriously nerve-racking events, the job interview, is perfect for these sorts of foot-in-mouth moments. The combination of excitement and pressure can cloud our judgment and lead us to make mistakes, decisions and comments that we wouldn’t normally make.
Score: Food 5/10, Waiter 10/10
18. Vanderslice - Aint Nothin
For the small legal practice this new Handbook is an implementation nightmare. Fortunately the SRA are offering roadshows to get you abreast of the new regime. There is one in London on 6 September so book in. It's free and there is that lure of free CPD.
I Will Always Love You – No one does Whitney like Whitney, but Amber Riley delivered.
He failed to hide his grin, “I have to bring a –tion word and what it means to school on Monday.”
This can be an awkward one. I mentioned to a couple of close relatives prior to Dex being born that we weren't keen to have advice (or more so, instruction) shoved down our throats. This by a few was taken as, we don't want any help, we don't want any visitors and basically leave us to it. You certainly can't get it right everytime! Anyway what I was told by others, and what I found was easiest, was to listen to the advice given, remember that they are trying to help, no matter whether it comes across that way or not, and in the end, you know what works for your baby, no one else, so you know (or you will learn), what works and what doesn't.
Competitions: Guess The Saint and Spot The Real Priest PLUS Respectable Slow Dancing – Father Tony gets his ruler out and ladies, this is your chance to get up close and personal as the priests once-and-for-all ascertain the official “safe” dancing distance for a sin-free samba.
I worked with a guy who in the mid-nineties once claimed hush-hushedly to have structured a big series of "repair bonds" for the Olympus Corporation. He was not boasting, but trying to help. For this was interesting to me for no other reason than I was managing a reasonably-sized long-short book primarily in Japan, and such information hitherto was (except for precious few) completely unknown to the market. It was concurrent to the exposition that many Japanese companies had such liabilities, yet the analysts I queried about the possibility of such liabilities at Olympus laughed it off with incredulity, as they cheered the stock higher with estimate upgrades and near-ubiquitous buy recommendations.
A senior U.S. official, speaking on condition of anonymity, denied that the administration had passed on to Chen Guangcheng any threat of violence to his family, but did say that Chen was told that if he stayed in the embassy indefinitely, his family would be returned to their home province.
I've been traveling, my husband was out of town for an entire month, the boys have been ill, I've been ill, and the rental isn't going to plan.
“For too many people, we weren’t listening.
CoenzymeQ10 is an effective antioxidant involved in the energy process and present in every cell in the body. CoQ10 levels in the body diminish with age. CoQ10 destroys free radicals and slows aging. Spinach, broccoli and peanuts are foods high in CoQ10.
James took the Puritan petition seriously enough to call for a conference which took place in October 1603 at Hampton Court. This luxurious, one thousand roomed, estate just outside of London had originally been built by Cardinal Wolsey. Only four moderate representatives of the Puritan cause were invited to participate in the conference before the king at Hampton Court. The nine Bishops and Deans and the Privy Council were clearly prejudiced against the Puritans. King James delivered the opening address making clear that the doctrine and policy of the state church was not up for evaluation, or reconsideration. He made no effort to hide his frustration with the Presbyterian model he had endured in Scotland. Those who had hoped that he would be sympathetic to the Presbyterian or Puritan cause had obviously misunderstood his intransigence on this issue. However, the Puritans were not allowed to attend the first day of the conference and when, on the second day, the four Puritans were allowed to join the meeting they started on the wrong foot by suggesting: "Let's broaden the decision making base. Why shouldn't the bishops govern jointly with a presbytery of their brethren, the pastors and ministers of the church."
Tomb Serpents
After last night I wasn't sure I would feel so bright and cheerful today.
I had lunch with my former MIL on Friday, an outing that was long overdue. I easily get wracked with guilt if I don't keep up that relationship. She'll call me occasionally, but I'm usually the one to call and make plans, and that's more than OK. She's earned the privilege. She's been sick with this and that, so understandably hasn't felt up to going out (although I think she knows I'm happy to just go there for a visit, too). But she's on the mend, so we went and got some lunch. It was good to catch up.
What happened from what I seen:
Gwenhwyfar can’t avoid these things. She counts herself lucky to get through one more day, and service in Cecily’s house is just salt in the wound.
I remember taking a parenting class when my daughter was five, and my son 18 months and the teacher asked the class what attributes we hoped our children would have when they left the home at 18. WOW, talk about planning ahead! She told us to go home and have our spouses fill out the paper as well, and compare. That was an interesting exercise, as many of our spouses had differing views regarding the top five attributes. Once we did that, however, she explained that is was OUR model and our planning that would help us to help them achieve these traits. For although they are born with inherent traits, many are fostered in the home or in the community and unless we planned, they could pick up other, less appealing ones from other sources. That was the first time I realized that I had that much influence over a human being!
Brewery Ommegang Cooperstown, NY Hennepin Farmhouse Saison Farmhouse Saison
“The old man won’t notice anything’s gone until he does inventory tonight. Besides, he won’t know you had anything to do with it.”
Things that should be taken into account are the current use of the property, the history of how the land was acquired, the market value, etc
9)If you had to choose 1 item in your shop as a signature piece, what would it be and why?Any of my yoga mat bags. They are the main focus for my originality on Etsy. I try to steer clear of things that other crocheters are making. My apple cozies are the most popular of my items. My version is just enough different from others' to really fill a niche.
honored by an utterance of the Hare Krishna mantra. In
If a student fails to learn a concept that is supposedly so important for him to know that he has spent hours and hours on it, but the class forges ahead despite this failure, what does that tell the student about the true importance of his learning?
Over in the speed skate team pursuit, Canada takes gold and the US wins silver. In the team pursuit, all three skaters have to cross the finish line to register their time. It was a close race between Canada and the US for gold. The US pulled a surprise victory in the qualifing rounds over Netherlands to take the spot to compete against Canada for gold. The gold winning Canadian team includes Denny Morrison--an alternate in the Torino Olympics--with former short tracker Mathieu Giroux and Lucas Makowsky. The silver medal American team was led by veteran Chad Hedrick and had teenagers Brian Hansen, Trevor Marsicano, and Jonathan Kuck. The Netherlands team--led by Sven Kramer and with Mark Tuitert, Simon Kuipers, and Jan Blokhuijsen--set an Olympic record in winning their bronze match against Norway.
“We expected in the first year that we wouldn’t be approaching full occupancy because people couldn’t see what it was, or no one could attest whether or not it was a good place to live,” said Steven Ludwig, vice president of administrative affairs for SCSU. “We expected occupancy to ramp up for the first three and five years. Between the time when we committed and when it went forward, we had that recession intercede. I think it changed the character of the market and softened it. We were expecting initially to be closer to 2/3 or ¾ occupancy the first year, so we undershot a little what we expected but we will still row as we go.”
before open the next page. You must be at least 21 years of age to enter Indian escortâ€™s
On 10 April 1970 Paul McCartney formally announced the breakup of the Beatles, releasing his first solo album McCartney. The first song, of course, is “Lovely Linda,” which is the shortest song in the extensive McCartney catalog at 42 sec. The entire album sets the stage for things to come. Paul McCartney did all vocals and instruments himself, with the exception of a few vocals provided by Linda. By this time, the McCartneys, which now included daughter Mary and would soon include daughter Stella, had moved to Scotland in order to get away from the legal nightmare that was the Beatles.
dive-alish
Conan’s Team (or TeamCoco) and Mashable got together to create a zany story line that included Conan buying Mashable and even pushing aside site founder and CEO Pete Cashmore.
and time hasn’t caught up with us yet.
and the weakness consumed her
I have used my Silhouette to cut out the scalloped edge on the paper before mounting onto my card
Good afternoon everyone. I just wanted to update everyone on some upcoming events that will be taking place here on my blog for the month of October. Along as update you all on the progress of the 12 Days of Christmas Blog Hop I will be sponsoring in December. I will be posting some pictures of some of the awesome blog candy I have already received from some of the wonderful truly amazing sponsors I have for the hop. Also I will be posting a few pictures of some of the things I will be including in the hop as blog candy. There is sure to be lots of blog candy for the 12 Days of Christmas Blog Hop. I will be filling 12 stockings and giving one away each day of the hop. If by the end of the 12 Days of Christmas Blog Hop I have reached my goal of 1000 followers I will be giving one of my lucky followers a 4 foot stocking full of all kinds of crafting goodies and some yummy goodies. Now on to all the exciting updates of upcoming events for this month.
Make a game out of it. You may as well, because no one will be able to force or predict timing. Expect that to be forever and you can only be pleasantly surprised.
So, one relatively fine day, my friends and I made the drive to get McDonald's and comic books...and Nightcrawler was already sold out by the time I got there. Apparently there was two per case or box or whatever, and they went immediately. Although I'm pretty sure my friends were less than sympathetic, I was crushed. I bought an Iron Man PVC, a feeble second-best. And I went back to that comic store many times, and others; and other PVC's were produced in staggering numbers, but I never saw a Nightcrawler one. Not once.
Most of the stories that Tiger made up during the free play session leaned more towards fantasy than facts, especially of animal behaviour and characteristics, so I suggested that he read the following book to get ideas for his next puppet show. James Herriot worked as a vet so his knowledge and observations of animals are very accurate. The challenge in getting children to learn science through storytelling is in helping them to find the balance between creating an interesting story and staying true to scientific facts.
Now again, because this color combo is a darker one, i like to leave some areas white so when i go over the whole thing to blend, it doesnt get too dark on me. Also, when i add a a dark color as my main color, i do like to start with the edges/shadows first so that i can still see my stamp lines. Not always, but it is my norm with this particular color family. In this case, I've started with my shade color of E27 because there just isnt enough space in the image to get too wild with a bunch of different colors.
But no matter. Not even if you take on board the concept that Ethiopia was not, to a mediaeval person, the country it now is, in north east africa, oh no. Ethiopia was the whole dark mysterious continent we now call Africa.
Burridge kicked off the 2011/12 Southampton Football League season on Saturday 3 September, against Netley Central Reserves, at the Shed, Botley Road, Burridge. This blog was written on the electric daisy wheel of a Canon S200 typewriter, whilst listening to the soundtrack to the film, Inception, by Hans Zimmer.
When you came back from Paris, you started Blue Meanies. But there was only one release, a single 'Pop Sensibility'. How come it was also brief?
Never really heading skyward
series of graphic novels. Like Battlestar Galactica, it is played dead straight, there is a dearth of humour. Unlike most Zombie movies, the cast is not full of gung-ho heroes, cowering cowards and moronic zombie bait. I think the writers of this series decided that all such stereotypes would have died during the initial stages of the zombie plague.
Peer Helpers are reminded to pick a research paper topic by Thursday. Sign up sheet is on the resource room door. Final paper due May 11th.
The surprising thing is that one not usually expects sharks in such cold water! Yet we saw some monster through the binoculars one day while following the cormorants feeding. This is a baby whale shark of 6 meters long. We cannot determine why it died, but I am glad that the sea dumped it on this very quiet spot where it will not be crowded and prodded. We had only about two sunny days, so mostly a very cold tide washes over it and I hope that one of our big winter storms will return it to the ocean. Little Mitzi never blinked an eye and automatically accepted the large body in its final rest. What was truly strange was that she barked angrily every time the tide pushed in to wash over the shark!
whether the social value of patenting is substantially reduced "because it
The sales assistants should really show you how to apply them because, even though I knew I was a useless lash fixer, I still tried…and tried…and gave up. At one point I had a lovely curly moustache,( not ideal if you are a lady though). Luckily the glue wouldn’t stick over my lip so it didn’t adhere. Phew!
The book that we worked on last year based on interviews with unschooling/natural learning advocates is scheduled for publishing and we can't say more than that- but stay tuned.
We'll start our tour here, and I'll guide you through each section of the city, ending back here before the end of the day. If we're lucky, we might even finish before midday, just in time for a bite to eat. If not, rest assured, there're are plenty of places to refresh yourselves between now and the end.
These books are inspired and if you, you children and your grand-children haven't discovered them yet, then you have a lifetime of treats in store, so dive in.
It doesn’t help that werewolves are an endangered species. They’re being systematically wiped off the face of the earth in fact. An organisation known as WOCOP (World Organisation for the Control of Occult Phenomena) has been carrying out the Hunt for years and now, so he has been told by his friend Harley (a WOCOP operative), Jake is the last of his kind. He has mixed feeling about the news. Part of him would quite like to be done with it all. Quite a big part actually. So when one of the WOCOP operatives, Ellis (six-four, waist-length white hair, eyes the colour of lapis lazuli), knocks on his door and kicks him in the goolies only to tell him that it’s time he takes things seriously: the night of the next full moon will be his last. Up until then its hands off. No one will lay a finger on him; he’s Grainer’s:
However, you don't want them to be putty in your hands, they have to take control sometimes..
14) John Ashcroft, my homeboy; singer of patriotic harmony and coverer of statue boobs
After what I’d call my first full week on placement with xPublishing, don’t let anybody tell you that you won’t ever have to use Microsfot Excel if you’ve chosen a Graphic Design related degree. Have used it for the first time since I scraped a pass in AS Level ICT, and it is still no more fun!
Economic growth
And now on to round 2! The theme for this round was creative die cuts. Negatives are one of my favorite ways to use dies, so that's the route I went.
Fool me once.... We were keeping an eye on updates from the Met Office and Scot Rail, we were texting friends and family to check they were OK and could pick the kids up from school, we were complaining about our uncaring employer; one thing the staff at the EERIE were definitely not doing was working.
Here is a little tidbit from the Willy Week: Kells has applied to open Kells Brew Pub in Nob Hill and Old Town Pizza have applied to start brewing at their Vanport location.
Donald Trump built the Trump World Tower, a FAR building of 38 on a site with a FAR zoning of 10, next to and higher than the United Nations building. The Red (TDR) and Yellow (incentive) illustrate how misuse and excessive use of transferable development rights and incentive zonings, without overall caps on height, produce a building out of scale and context Source : Municipal Art Society of New York
So I usually don’t use this blog as a place to write personal stuff or talk about pop culture, but this has been bothering me so much that I m going to put in on the intertubes and let it go.
The Eleanor Cross at Charing Cross Station. Following his wife's death in 1290, Edward I erected crosses along the funeral procession route from Lincoln to London. The original was destroyed in 1647 during the English Civil War and was later replaced by a statute of Charles I. This replica, built in 1865 and placed a few hundred yards from the original, is more ornate than the original (click image to enlarge to see detail).
Should she stop to offer help? She couldn’t see anyone near the car. Besides, if the vehicle had broken down, the driver could have walked out of the desert. She snapped a photo of the car—it looked so out of place among the creosote bushes and jutting boulders that it made a compelling picture, especially with that distant knoll as a backdrop.
Fortunately, the majority of wedding couples DO follow-up after their initial inquiry and DO end up talking with me or meeting me in person -- and enough of those end up hiring me to keep my calendar pretty full. But still, I find myself pondering all those who leave me hanging after I took the trouble to respond to their inquiry.
Congratulations to Patrick deWitt, winner of the 2011 Governor General’s Award for fiction for his book The Sisters Brothers.
Her response to me is the reason why I like her to this day and, for the most part, have remained loyal to her even when I seriously disagreed with her. She looked me in the eye, admitted that things had been handled badly. She then shared with me a few details that hadn’t yet been made public, which, while they did not excuse what had happened, did cast a kinder light on some of her choices. She then asked me to give her a chance to learn from her mistakes.
I come home
I'm sure the first idiot to say "Hey, y'all watch this!" with a firework will make the front page of the paper, but its about time you could legally buy and possess a bottle rocket in Michigan (which, contrary to the article is hardly a high-powered firework, yeesh). The law was previously pretty universally ignored with an outpouring of cars heading to our neighboring states every year in July to load up for the 4th of July celebrations, and only the occasional returning car busted for buying the forbidden fireworks.
Hence my blog title. I'm not arrogant or daft enough to think I'll write the next bestseller but I think I owe it to myself to give writing a serious try. Even if it doesn't turn out like that I'll have finally done a degree in a subject I'm actually interested in.
9. Major Expansion of Support for Community Ownership
In order to create a feasibility study, entrepreneurs need to define dimensions of business viability including: market viability, technical viability, business model viability, management model viability, economic and financial model viability, and exit strategy viability.
Some may think a bragging buddy dangerously promotes arrogance. Acuff suggests a private “bragging table” is safe middle ground between arrogance and feeling ashamed of personal desires to share our accomplishments.
Enough of the geeky logistics of it all, lets talk about what happened in round one. There were no surprises at the top of the draft. The top two selections were as advertised. Andrew Luck was taken with the #1 pick by the Indianapolis Colts. Robert Griffin III meanwhile, was taken #2 by the Washington Redskins. Each quarterback has all of the required tools to become an elite player. Circumstances and talent around them will determine if they’re potential is fulfilled.
FDA admits that New Jersey politicians pressured it to approve unsafe, defective medical device. While cynics might question how Obama can pay for his plan with $800 million in heretofore – unknown waste , fraud and inefficiency if he turns the entire medical industry over to the care of politicians, instead of just most of it, as it is now, this case clearly shows how it can be done. Hope and change: we will hope that, for instance, Senator Frank Lautenberg, as corrupt and venal today a 92 as he was when he slithered from a snakes belly in 1917, will feel a new responsibility to his country and stop stealing from it. There’s the change we need all right. Robert Menendez will also change his spots. He’s been indicted but never convicted so there’s plenty of room for optimism that he’ll decide to stop accepting bribes from constituents and knuckle down to doing the country’s work.
Rat poison was put craftily in the sweeteners place
Boss: Did McGyver lose the key or something?
I can barely bring myself to purchase new from the store anymore. Although, target had skirts on sale for $4.98 and that is as good as goodwill, so I snatched those right up.
22God, even God the Lord, God, even God the Lord, he sees, and Israel will see–if it is in pride or in sin against the Lord,
Plus,fracking means thousands of other jobs,too —jobs New York needs to get out of its economic doldrums.
After all, what's to worry about? We still have our house, I have primed myself for the worst case scenario in terms of it's condition after renting it out for two years and am hoping that I can only be pleasantly surprised that it'll be better than my imaginings. Stevie would go back to work in the same job or better probably. The kids would go back to speaking English and still have their friends in the UK. Both of them would start at school where everybody would speak English as a first language and life would be nice and easy for them. I would have all my UK friends to go back to and all the wonders of UK shopping, and magazines and books!!! (Oh how I miss going into a bookshop and having more than a couple of shelves to choose from!). It sounds easy enough, a breeze even.
Not having a background in chemistry, geology or dermatology, reading the articles reminded how fortunate we are to have the help of specialists like Andrew and Dr. Gomez, especially in situations where the stakes are high and those most affected are the poor. Our friend Scott from Food for the Hungry in Nicaragua makes a similar point, but more memorably that I could, in his blog post about Christian compassion and professionalism.
This is really a fun project I made for 'Alyaa and will make another one for Anis.
Use the umbrella for showers, spring or get well cards.
The book is easy to burn through in one sitting, and even recommended, as the plot unfolds better and the twist is more efficient with all details kept close to mind. Palahniuk uses short paragraphs and intertwining topics, habitually going off-course when opportunity presents itself and when the moment feels right. With Fight Club, Chuck Palahniuk creates a terrifying image of contemporary America, painting society in all its nihilistic delight and turning anarchy into one of the greatest weapons of our time.
Vol. 1, No. 18, 7 January, 1859, pp. 208-209.
that the ache in my womb
The Block Party featured face painting, games, music and fun for adults, kids, families and the whole community. Participants said this was their first block party ever to be held in this neighborhood, and organizations brought information about domestic violence, human trafficking and more.
Mohammed, the rental shop owner, should be OK. He owns the freehold and is on the look out for a bright young Australian who, he hopes, will turn it into a trendy wifi cafe like several other successful new ventures nearby. There goes the neighbourhood.
carved panels and woodwork. I've never seen anything like it.
Enough for one day. Start on the flames tomorrow. That was fine until I got home and realized – The flames do not come from on top of the wood, but from under, and around it, and through and between each log. Oh, dear. Oh, dear. What to do?
So please, keep your charge!
“I’ve noticed on the weekends there are many more visitors than on weekdays. It probably happens with families being so busy nowadays. If a spouse is in here though, usually their partner comes every day and visits.”
Winter Green Farm is an organic farm located just outside of Eugene, Oregon.
Then, when the teacher started to tell us about singing with the karaoke machine he had brought - which he has been telling us about for a while so it's not like there wasn't warning, she butted in.
I have to say I am quite lucky with my cravings so far : steak, cherry tomatoes, clementines, fish...
“They took me upstairs to be a born again human being and be God’s helper to alcoholics” (Letter from Larry B., A.A. old-timer from Cleveland, Ohio to the author, dated September 18, 1992. Larry stated that this quote correctly described his surrender; see also, Dick B., The Golden Text of A.A., p. 32).
keep punching (someone needs to do it)
Kim talks about the influence Greek plays and Ibsen had on his scriptwriting; his dislike of ‘ism’s’ and ideologies; and his dislike of clear-cut endings, among many other things. Kim seems relaxed in the comfort of his home, taking puffs on his pipe as he delivers his answers, which he appears to be reading from a prepared manuscript.
– Oh, I will. I am the very poster boy of discretion, me.
Monkey, Band of Joy (Robert Plant, oh GOD)
See? Standing tall and firm on the face of temptation breeds extra sweet, delicious fruits afterall!
“I read it, of course, for the workmanship. That made me think I had neglected novels too long— that there might be a good many books as graceful in style somewhere on the shelves; so I began a course of novel reading. I have dropped it now; it did not amuse me. But as regards Robert, the effect on me was exactly as though a singer of street ballads were to hear excellent music from a church organ. I didn’t stop to ask whether the music was legitimate or necessary. I listened, and I liked what I heard. I am speaking of the grace and beauty of the style.
5. Purchase or steal a combie/kombi. They are fairly awesome. I would paint mine green and blue and red. I would put a musical device in the back and attach beads to every possible thing. I’d invite people to my kombi for kombi parties. We’d drive the kombi, talk about the kombi, suckle its sweet juices and play kombi games like kombi twister and kombi yahtzee. Maybe some kombi snap, which is a kombi card game.
Sorry, mama!
This experience is not the reason I don't want to send my kids to school, but I do think about it every time someone brings up the socialization issue. School is far from being an ideal social environment for all children. And before you say you can't protect your children from being made fun of, it's going to happen anyway, I will tell you I do realize that. But they will be able to choose who to socialize with instead of being stuck with the same kids every day, whether they like it or not. My children will learn that they do not ever have to put up with abuse or harassment.
Honestly - the best fun we have had in AGES!! i highly recommend it.
I got suddenly very ill one night. I was laying in my bed, unable to sleep when the walls began to move in and out – I could literally see the flower pattern moving away and then drawing near again. Then the lights flashed on and off. On and off. My soft, warm blankets suddenly became heavy, like slabs of concrete, falling on me, one after another. My parents were down the hall, watching TV, and the Mac trucks on the show they were watching were suddenly in the hallway, making their way toward my bed to run me over. I screamed for my mom, who came running in, with a worried look on her face. I explained what was going on, and she asked me a most peculiar question: “Who am I?”
I also realised as I flicked through the papers that the London Marathon is taking place next weekend. Exactly where the last year has gone I have no idea. I'm glad I'm not running this year, there is no way I could have fitted in the training with the way my work schedule has been but seeing it advertised does make me slightly envious. Wow, the sunshine must have really gone to my head this weekend!
CONCLUSION: Despite it’s flaws — a weaker 3rd third of the movie — this was a grade-A psychological + supernatural thriller. The creepiness! The ending! What a twist! The flaws keep it down at an 8/10 IMDB rating, but this is a 5-star horror movie nonetheless.
The money fog is almost always worse when we’re using credit cards, because the spending is often unconscious. In other words, you don’t really have to think about it, you just hand over your card without even considering what the balance already is. Provided you’re not at your limit you can easily do a day of retail therapy, or compulsive shopping, without giving the total amount spent another thought! You can just shop until you drop! Whilst you can also be in the money fog when using cash or debit cards, reality is closer at hand! You will either run out of money, need another trip to the money machine, or your debit card or EFT POS card will be rejected. Your spending therefore has to be, if not completely , at least partially, conscious.
66-85 Killed by the Men of the Lion
That men are delegated the authority from God to forgive sin on his behalf is clearly a part of Divine Revelation. Two passages show this ambassadorial relationship.
I predict however, that in the next few months the sense of numbness and helplessness that Greeks feel at the speed and scope of the changes wears off there is going to be a massive groundswell of resistance against the government. Already the first signs are apparent, it is estimated that 20% of road users are now refusing to pay motorway tolls and despite government officials promises to clamp down that figure is set to rise as non-payment becomes more widely percieved as an act of resistance rather than just a way of saving money.
Bottom line is, there has to be REALITY IN FICTION. Only way for a reader to truly believe in the journey.
Was Jesus advocating rejection of family? No, he was teaching a principle to follow. If doing the will of the Father contradicts the desires of my family, I must choose Christ. I must do it prayerfully. I must do it gently and with great patience, grace and love. I must do it without bitterness, anger or condemnation of my family. But I must follow Christ.
Bad: The lobby interior will be saved…as the punchline to a joke. “The pointy-heads at the LPC wanted to save the lobby? See: it’s saved. Of course, the theater that it was the entry to is gone.” Before architectural design settled on glass curtain walls as the epitome of all civilization, there was a concept called the hierarchy of spaces. In short, not all rooms are equally important. The lobby was – and may be again – a beautiful space, but it was the antechamber to the theater. The more important space is permanently gone, likely to be replaced by a CVS, and the intended traffic flow through the lobby (from the street to the orchestra-level entrance ahead and the grand stairs to the sides) is gone. A meaningful step in a hierarchy from public and ugly to private and beautiful is now floating in chaos.
But love for these two is always reciprocal. It's not about one partner making a sacrifice for the other's sake. Throughout the story, they keep rescuing each other. And the stakes are high. Jamie marries Claire originally in order to save her from Black Jack Randall. Would that be a striking thing to do, if Jack Randall was not, in fact, a serious threat? He _is_ a serious threat; we learn that from Jamie's backstory. The man's a genuine sadistic psychopath, who has essentially destroyed Jamie's family and seriously injured him, both physically and emotionally. And here's Jamie swearing to give Claire everything he has; the protection of his name and his clan--and the protection of his body--in order to save _her_ from this man.
It took having a girl contact me through my blog to realize that I haven't wrote in forever. I've been meaning to, but we all know how that goes. Right now seems like the perfect timing though to start back up under the circumstances.
For many, being published is one of the greatest feelings there is. For those of us earning a living from it, being paid for it is even better! But, can anything beat that feeling of publication? I think so. Reader interaction.
"But! But! He's LYING!!!"
as much as I do.
So, after cutting up the petals (some small, some big) I started laying them out around the neck first. Then I worked my way down, petals getting bigger down the shirt.
It was during miles 4 and 5 that I really started to struggle. My legs felt exactly the same as they did at miles 19 and 20 of the NYC Marathon - heavy and overcome by the previous miles of hills. My pace dropped to 9:30s, numbers I havent seen in a race since the marathon.
No one really knows what I am doing or why. Unless someone makes an effort comparable to my effort in all the subjects and directions that I am making it, will they be able to either understand or critique what I am doing. I have met no such person, not even my Veda Guru and not even my single student.
‘The revelation of Jesus ought not to give rise to a religion. All religion leads to war, but the Word of God is not a religion, and it is the most serious of all betrayals to have made of it a religion.’
When she was just five years old, Alyssa witnessed her two-year old sister suffer a near-fatal asthma attack while flying from New York to Utah. “Our flight had to be redirected to New Jersey so that she could receive basic medical treatment that was not available on the flight. As we were flying back to Utah, her condition worsened and she stopped breathing four separate times. During this stressful and dangerous time for my sister, I realized that I have asthma as well, along with numerous other people I know, and that we could be in similar situations at any time. It was then that I decided that I wanted to cure asthma so that I would never face the risk of losing my sister, or my father to asthma-related reasons again,” she explains.
Our spiritual travels together had come to an end. As we said our goodbyes at the lodge and prepared to re-enter the mundane world, it was time to make my initial post-vision assessment of my dimensional experiences. Interpretations will evolve as time passes, so it is important to make one’s best initial interpretation as close to the event as possible. This gives a vital and unique point of perspective for comparison to later thoughts and ideas.
You will be SO HAPPY that you completed this challenge!
Baxter’s conscience is tortured, but his prose is clear. ”I spent many years trying to interpret existence, when I ought to have been squandering it.” Now he is trying to intepret it again, he runs up against the same wall as every writer who ever tried hard enough. How to reduce to writing those ineffable moments, the sharing of which in language is the writer’s simple, but impossible, ambition?
At the official level, the US pretends to regard China in a benevolent way, much as an artist regards a major patron of the arts. Make no mistake, China’s government is not benevolent and certainly does not have the United States‘ best interests at …
We’ll check out Istanbul for 2-3 days and then head on towards the city of Hopa in the far north-east of Turkey, with a sleepover somewhere along the way.
"If I had a serious brain injury...."
Gregory: he killed Osama bin Laden
Perhaps I am. Perhaps indeed I am. Here you must decide for me.
and I never missed it.
03 - Amor en las Trincheras/Chacarera Doble (2:58)
Cause you know how to give me that
I speak, of course, of the doom descending upon us tomorrow. If I may suggest something, let us gather together and sing Track 6 from Document, and no, it is important that you do more than just scream "Leonard Bernstein!"
I didn't submit this one, but I couldn't resist sharing it, this was day 2 of the snow fun and baby Bella's first time in the snow. (don't worry! she was only out for a minute before we brought her in a got her dressed properly)
A good marriage is full of talking and communicating. I don't do enough of it (and I am told that a lot). It drives her crazy. It makes her want to leave me. I would tell myself that I just need to listen really well and it should be okay. But, she tells me that she needs my words. I never thought my words were good enough. She was being starved for them and I cared, but still didn't think I was good enough.
I also included a disclaimer that people who did not want to see that part of me should not read what I wrote.
It is sometimes easier to convince yourself of something rather than facing it head on. That doesn’t mean it works out well.
Written on August 19, 2011
Hope’s more then just a glimmer in eye.
It really was a whoosh, bang, wallop moment! Nothing horrible, nasty or scary. Nothing momentous, life changing or ground breaking
(or, as I would say, west to east)
Every day, newspapers and magazines are filled with photos of war, oppression and violence. The photographer that enables us to watch what is happening in the rest of the world from the safety of our own homes, however, usually remains invisible. This is not the case in Black Passport, the biography of war photographer Stanley Greene, which appeared in book form in 2009 and will be exhibited in Foam starting on 16 December. Photos of conflict and disaster regions such as Rwanda, Sudan, Chechnya and Iraq are alternated with photos from the private life of Stanley Greene: photos of Paris and many women. Slide shows will also be presented, interspersed with texts from the book. Greene's voice resounds through the exhibition space - he is disconcertingly frank: 'I think you can only keep positive for eight years. If you stay at it longer than that, you turn. And not into a beautiful butterfly.'
Sundays before a week in the field never really get any easier. There’s a strange thing in the air; the anticipation of being away, the forethought of separation.
1 aimed
Genre: Psychedelic, World Fusion
— Twilight Sentinel (2003) —
May The Lord Himself, who is our source of peace, give me peace at all times and in every way! Amen! May The Lord be with me! Amen!
The point is, I’ve been conditioned since music class in elementary school to follow the bouncing ball.
Alysia Basmajian, 23, Bayonne, N.J.
You might say I'm a good mother if my children are quiet and reserved in public. But how do you know they aren't only acting that way because they are afraid of me? Afraid of what I will do to them if they make any noise or sudden movements? And if that's your idea of a good mother, then count me out.
12) Benchmarking against partners, suppliers and customers within your supply chain
Wild Bill - director: Dexter Fletcher (UK) - This little film has a big heart along with some clever writing, sincere performances and plenty of amusing moments. It may be a little uneven at times, but I think it's entertaining and funny enough to find a good-sized audience.
Only a minority pedal heroin? –
Born from the silence a child is found,
You've called this YA but the story feels more middle grade to me. The stakes aren't very high, and the level of threat is pretty mild. Glass throwing ghosts are scary but not terrifying.
I’m a writer. I’ve always been a writer and have the degrees (and accompanying student loan debt) to prove it. Since I was young, I’ve loved stories. I’d read anything. One teacher called me an omnivorous reader. As a child, my mother would yell at me to stop reading the back of the cereal box (”It hasn’t changed since yesterday!”) or I’d be late to school . And she knew that with a good book, she could keep me busy and placated for hours.
tendencies to converse easily, freely, and at great length but not necessarily with the kind of substantive content the research requires.
It's proof that the Dick Tracy costumes make everyone look better. Bright coats ad hats rule.
Very Good - Excellent Audience
The truth is I needed the break. As much as I hated it…I needed it. Part of writing about supernatural or fantasy topics is the journey you go on with your characters. Authors in this genre are lucky for the amazing and sometimes enlightening road our stories and characters take us down.
I encourage you to question things. You were given a mind that has great capacity for logic and reasoning – use it. You fulfill your purpose as you use the talents God has given you, and you were given the ability to think. Don’t simply let someone else do the thinking for you.
The specialist did mention to Steph that she thought there may be a chance they could come home on Friday as long as Levi's counts continue to rise and he stops getting fevers. Of course, we know the dangers of getting our hopes up, but it is really, really hard not to at this point. Steph desperately needs a break, and it would do Levi wonders to get some good nights of uninterrupted sleep in his own bed. A chance to recharge as a family would go a long way in getting us ready to tackle round two. So, please also be in prayer that this visit home will be possible.
Blue, but you are Rose, too,
The longer I procrastinate on returning phone calls and emails, the more guilty I feel about it. The guilt I feel causes me to avoid the issue further, which only leads to more guilt and more procrastination. It gets to the point where I don't email someone for fear of reminding them that they emailed me and thus giving them a reason to be disappointed in me.
when she said ‘Hello’ to me.
This post is both the last installment of the Modern Slavery Guide and the first of the Modern Freedom Guide, based on Humanity’s new paradigm: a world without masters and slaves, only humans, eye to eye and heart to heart.
I am in a clearing season. I have been proactively clearing my plate, my schedule, my days. I have been checking things off my list, eliminating activities and commitments that are not absolutely essential. I am re-prioritizing my life.
Overall, a suspenseful story steeped in history. Highly recommended.
Box office: 020 7258 2925
This is the journal page that was sitting on my WOYWW desk the other day...
My ankle felt fine and I thought in order to get fit again another walk was in order. I spent 2 hours on the trails and enjoyed the bird life, some I had not seen before which was a thrill. A simple lunch of chicken and cheese sandwiches, banana and an apple kept the fuel levels up in the 11c conditions.
Good Sunday Afternoon,I hope today was a good one for you.It was for me.Got up early always do seems the older I get the earlier I wake up.Oh well got a lot done today.
My bright-eyed friend looked up from her newspaper, gave me a once-over, and told me I looked happy. I blinked and thought, what a rare and lovely compliment.
I inhaled and slapped my hands over my mouth and nose. Water slammed into my boots and up my sides, covering my face. Pressure swept the air from my chest and throat in a flurry of bubbles. Cold soaked my coat, dragging me deep. (p. 16)
MH: Ah, you tease. Can't wait for the ending to this series and to see what you have in store for us next. Thanks for your time and enjoy the whiskey.
4. Dorothy meets many fascinating friends along the way: a talking scarecrow, a talking tin-man (?!), and a talking lion. With loving affection they support each other in their common goal – to petition the Wizard for various body parts. And courage. And a one-way ticket back to Kansas.
We are so proud of having Rebecca in the production of Esther the Musical and if you had not had a chance to catch her in action, come on out this Friday April 27 and Saturday April 28. We look forward to her final two performances in Esther the Musical. I leave you with a couple of her favorite quotes.
Cute. Cute. As a button.
And speaking of fear, I’ve given my son’s baptism some thought. I’m shocked that his Polish grandmother (my ma) hasn’t kidnapped him yet to get him dunked in holy water though there are moments when I think, darkly, that she has had, like my friend’s mother who took my friend’s daughter to have her secretly baptized. I could see my mother doing the same because she often worries about god being upset over this and that and her church finding out, too. I’m not blaming her at all for being this way — that’s how she was raised. And so I too, have grown up being told that I would be doomed for eternity had I not gotten dunked in the said holy water and I’ve had this belief so ingrained in me that there are moments now when I still wonder if I’m damaging my son’s heavenly future by not getting him that particular ticket to salvation. I will look at my partner (a hardcore atheist who was baptized to please his grandmother) with wild eyes (I imagine), once in a while, and say, “Maybe we should get him baptized?” My partner looks back at me and we both shake our heads, no, and remind ourselves that the child — when he’s all grown-up — can make that decision for himself, especially if that will make him feel better about life. I’m sure I won’t be too impressed if he does show up in a white robe with rosaries in his pocket and if he does we will probably try to exorcise each other — him with a bible, me with Hitchens on the opposite side — but I want my son to know that his faith or lack of should never come from being afraid. Hitchens didn’t let himself be scared by death into buying into something that brought him no comfort even when there was fear of the unknown but he’s been kind, even when talking about people who wanted to pray for him (September 20th was announced to “Everybody Pray for Hitchens Day“) to bring him salvation: “I don’t mean to be churlish about any kind intentions, but when September 20 comes, please do not trouble deaf heaven with your bootless cries,” he wrote. “Unless, of course, it makes you feel better.”
"Because I was trying to run on water."
As in the case of Jude, there is no evidence that the false teachers in 2 Peter held the cosmological dualism which is the essential mark of true Gnosticism. There is no evidence that their ethical libertinism was based on such dualism, or that their eschatological skepticism resulted from a gnostic concentration on realized, at the expense of future, eschatology. If they resembled some second-century Gnostics in denying the divine inspiration of OT prophecy (1:20-21a), they did so by attributing it to a merely human origin, no to the demiurge, as the second-century Gnostics did. There is no hint in 2 Peter of controversy about bodily resurrection, which was usually a main focus of anti-gnostic discussion of eschatology, because of the link between this issue and gnostic dualism…Conversely, there is no evidence that the delay of the Parousia, so important in 2 Peter, featured in second-century Gnostic argument against traditional eschatology.[84]
She made it into the building in time to see Principal Ledbetter giving everyone instructions to huddle in the hallway and place their books on the back of their heads. Gladys fell in place next to her friend Esther and whispered “It looks bad out there. I think there might be a tornado.” As if on cue there was a loud clacking and banging on the roof of the building. They could see the lightening and the crack of thunder. A huge pop and poof the lights went out. Gladys cowered lower on the floor with the heavy weight of the book on her neck.
Recept: That's right, Mr. President.
help!
Grumpole is now in Afghanistan - do we listen more to news from there or not?
I used papers from the On the Bright Side Collection from My Mind's Eye. I stamped the frame and then the sentiment inside and trimmed around the frame. I used the Ribbon Banner Die to create a "blue ribbon" of sorts. :) Stamping the banner image in white craft ink on the denim patterned paper gave more of a look of denim, I thought.
Dow Jones Newswires/Fox Business, 03/05/2012
respect authority,
11:00am: I woke up and found that I was being coerced into nibbling some saltines, and I was already eating despite being unconscious. They tasted unusually buttery which is about as loopy as I would get from meds all day. Someone had insisted I’d be tripping balls which was not the case.
And I let her wear that way on Sunday. Trying to decide what to do with her hair.
The Draco-Hydra reptilians made certain contractual agreements with the dark agenda groups in exchange for their control of humanity for slavery, and food.
Whether it's a makeshift conference room in a home office or a unique dining room set-up, mixing things up is a daring but visually-appealing decorating idea, like this space with antique chairs as well as tulip chairs.
When we first received this assignment, I felt a bit anxious and apprehensive. One of the objectives of a current events blog is to analyze a current issue and take a stand on it. I really don’t like being controversial and taking specific sides; I avoid debates at all costs because I fear offending anyone. This is why I took a little longer in commencing work on this assignment; I was afraid of it!
Given James Cameron’s track record of attacking Christianity, and specifically Christ’s resurrection in the roundly discredited documentary, The Lost Tomb of Jesus, it should not be surprising that he would write and direct a $300 million dollar propaganda piece that promotes the worship of nature and spirits.
8) At work I am privileged enough to work with people from many countries, including South Africa, Switzerland, Canada, Germany, Austria, The Netherlands, Australia, The Gambia and Cameroon. We also have collaborations with laboratories in the US, The Netherlands, Norway and France.
Am I the looney man?
Since its creation in 2006, Nothing But Nets has donated more than 6.4 million long-lasting insecticide-treated nets to Africa.
They brought horns, fiddles, family and friends. For some video that gives a sense of how the event sounded, click HERE.
First, I do not believe Carter has provided sufficient reasons to justify a wholesale abandonment of the sectarian-synagogal reading of John. He superficially addresses concerns about synagogue expulsion and intra-community conflict and seemingly only as a means to dismissing it to provide his own interpretive grid. In every generation the majority opinions of scholarship need to be reexamined, if only to remind scholars why those opinions have been so influential. Carter is to be applauded for his attempt to question the consensus, though his alternative to the two-level reading is not convincing.
Headline news this morning is that credit rating agencies have basically flushed the Italian economy down the toilet. More and more regularly, these scam artists are hitting the news, afforded some kind of guru status in the world of finance; the US recently lost its “AAA” status, and the UK found itself described as performing at “A+” level rather than “AA-”. Imagine bringing those grades home to your mum. The moral and financial panic that follows such announcements wipes billions off of economies.
3rd row: Knit.
Please excuse the crumpled fabric and the purple grid marks on Page 6 that haven't quite come out yet. I'm stitching in a hoop with the fabric tucked into a home-made q-snap grimeguard cover and it crumples it up a little bit. It'll all sort itself out after a rinse and press when finished so it's nothing to worry about.
She tauld thee weel thou wast a skellum (A worthless fellow),
79. Cried over someone? - Me, cry? I cry over everything. I cry when I'm sad. I cry when I'm glad. I cry when I'm sad or I'm glad or I'm mad.
While the whap-whap of hand-pulled wheat noodles dominates this soup shack, the place also fashions fat little purses of pork and scallions that dribble meaty juices with each bite ($3 for 12). 5410 Eighth Ave at 54th St, Sunset Park, Brooklyn (718-633-5633).
Next week, we’ll be back with the last of this series, Celebrity Brows, Part 3: Fully Loaded. Have a fabulous week!
Self preservation I guess is a natural thing. Throw enough car crashes in and soon……drivin aint so fun. I feel ya. Who wanna get hurt? True that……..better than that….
Give Springpad a try and see if it meets the needs of some of your genealogy research and note taking / storage activities. Leave a comment here or make a blog post about how you are using Springpad in your family history quest.
It’s her. He grunts and mumbles as he presses into her, one hand holding her arm down, other pointing a hunting knife to her throat. I’m terrified he will slip, enraptured and hurt her. She is calm, unafraid. His mind is frighteningly focused, each task allocated sufficient focus. He is alert and unfeeling. Why does he do this? There is no satisfaction for him, just a void inside growing deeper and darker.
(O superb! O Manhattan, my own, my peerless!
There’s someone like me — someone who knows this pain . I’d been a Christian for years, but the shame of an abortion at 15 heavily weighed on my heart. I had no idea other women also dealt with the same heartache.
# You are logged into a computer with the proper setup to obtain NETBIOS resolution.
we didn’t work out in reality
I was with my boyfriend and we were in a rush to catch a train, so I just took the picture in 2 minutes and I didn’t really have a conversation with him. I shall start taking pictures when I’m not running around to be able to get to know the strangers and their interesting stories, but it’s hard as I’m always in a rush.
And the rest is personal. What do you want in an agent? What’s important to you? Are you an email or phone person? Do you need hand-holding or editing or are you a loner? Do you need someone with a strong personality who can put you in your place or are you afraid of overly aggressive people?
7.Place And Old Friends
“That’s pretty tough…tough talk,” said Fletcher.
“Pranks reinforce the cultural ethos of creative joy,” Joost added. “Getting something done in a short period of time with no budget, and challenging circumstances. It’s glorious and epic. They didn’t ask for permission. Not even forgiveness.”
16.Spellbound
Ely was all for it. He encouraged me to enroll and offered to take money out of his 401k to pay for the tuition. But I had already managed to talk myself out of it. Besides I was afraid to borrow from his 401k. Afraid, afraid, afraid. Looking back, I can see so clearly how fear has ruled my entire life.
The image was coloured with Promarkers and Glamour Dust over Glossy Accents added on the scarf and hat, before cutting the whole image out. I created the frame behind using a Labels 17 nestie and the largest stamp from the Fancy Labels set from Our Daily Bread. I stamped the frame using Versamark and heat embossed using WOW! Plantinum embossing powder. The sentiment is from Lili of the Valley and again embossed with plantinum.
But you can't keep a good story down and, despite the legend of the candiru appearing to be just that - a legend - it continues to pop up on websites and TV shows with reckless abandon for the facts. It would be wrong and unscientific to say that there has never been a candiru attack on a penis - as you've seen, there is some evidence (albeit nearly all hearsay) to suggest that it might have happened. However, these cases are so rare and so unlikely that you probably have as much chance of a candiru attack as being hit by a falling meteorite. Certainly, in his deliciously-named book, Candiru : life and legend of the bloodsucking catfishes, biologist Stephen Spotte - who has spent 40 years studying the animal - concludes that lurid tales of the 'penis fish' are almost certainly urban myth.
you can find me in google with pen name dee3302
The result of combining these two divine things? Heavenly, tender, succulent pork shoulder and a lovingly reduced sauce that will transport your taste buds to nirvana. I’m not exaggerating. Don’t believe me? Try it for yourself.
I'm not sure why I've never made a diaper bag before. I've kind of been afraid of them. It's such a vital tool for a Momma and I know how picky I was about mine. But this one came together really well. And I think the key, really is just pockets, pockets, pockets.
05 - Pending the Morning Sun 3:42
Bought a new dress from h&m, I quite like it, altough I wonder how it'll look after a couple of times in the washingmachine..
Ok, that last rule isn't etched in stone. I just liked the symmetry.
Amazon cultivates a more open review community, which also opens it up to abuse of the system: sock puppets, paid reviews, review exchanges, boycott reviews, revenge reviews, etc. The only way to neutralize any of these abuses is to have a large pool of reviews for a given book.
Though the weekend was punctuated with other things, and complicated by the fact Laz could never retrieve his BoAs despite upgrading his new account, we got them to Level 23 fairly quickly.
yea yea yea, get your whining out of the way. It's a fruit fly. But a really useful one.
My Whoppers Malt Milkshake (PhP150+), however, made me very, very happy. I think the silly face can speak for itself. This milkshake is still probably the best of Manila’s best, and so I wasn’t surprised that I drank this greedily. You mustn’t step out of GRAMS without getting yourself a glass of this goodness.
Our new kitchen is very, very, typical Swedish for nowadays. White! Black! Stainless steel! An accent wall with wallpaper! IKEA cabinetry! I’ve seen versions of this kitchen in several other people’s houses. I guess we are not very creative people.
I shake me head and pull back from me temporary position within the side of the hedge. Tony has a look of exquisite anger on his red and lagered-up face –
And last but not least, one of the consultants Justin works with lives in NYC and commutes here every week. He offered to bring the people at work (and me) cookies from Levain Bakery. These cookies are seriously good. And they are 6 ounces a piece! 6 ounces of pure deliciousness.
Renewing in her rebirth, forever a refuge,
3) Slice, coat with sunflower seed meal combined with spices, and saute. I've seen some huge zucchini this year which make great "zucchini burgers" when sliced, spiced & sauteed
There really was no pleasing him; when, in 1889, Isaacson the painter praised his work, calling him a pioneer, VG wrote that his review was highly exaggerated and “it would be preferable if he said nothing about me at all” (letter 611). Later, when Aurier wrote a very overblown piece on him, he wrote back saying Gauguin and Monticelli deserved the praise. And he sold a painting, “the Red Vineyard”, at the Les Vingt exhibition in Brussels. All this leads Walther and Metzger, in the Taschen Van Goch, to the colossal assumption that “His solid conviction that he would have to pay for success, sooner or later, was to drive Van Gogh to suicide” (Van Gogh, the Complete Paintings, Taschen 2010, p.573). Lovely example of art criticism – not a scrap of evidence that this is true.
Gloucestershire Trading Standards also swung into action with a crackdown on counterfeit goods. The co-ordinated move was supported by Gloucestershire police and Cotswold District Council.
April 6th: Pray for James, the director of India Christian Ministries, as he wraps up a month in the United States. He has been away from his family for a month spreading the news of what ICM is doing in India! Pray that he will continue to seek direction from God as to what lies ahead for ICM.
I plan to show a photo or two, give the artist credit, and link back to the original blog post for all the details. So if you get an email from me asking if I can show your project on this blog, rest assured that I am not recreating your post but instead I hope to drive more traffic to your blog! And if your item is featured here, I hope you will post about it on your blog to send people here! I will also try to figure out some kind of linking system for people to submit items for consideration, and in the meantime you can email me with the link in the left sidebar.
Our goal is to raise an additional $2000 solely for the purchase of combos. However, the more we raise, the more we can provide for newly discovered adults and youngsters.
(Goodreads)
Do fans idolise their objects of affection too much sometimes? And if so, where to draw the line?
Rage Against the Machine
When my colleague and I drove home on Sunday night we stopped for some dinner along the way. I shouldn't have bothered: it all came out again on the way home. Needless to say Monday was spent recuperating a little. Yesterday was a fairly easy day and today will also be an easy day: I have to work later this afternoon. Since I know where I am going, it shouldn't be too hard.
DBP Program Development Head Vice President Paul Lazaro welcomed the attendees, after which ASSIST Managing Director Sreeni Narayanan, EMB-DENR Director Atty. Juan Miguel Cuna ECCP President Hubert D’ Aboville and ADFIAP Secretary General Octavio Peralta signed the partnership agreement.
Here's what the DT have been creating for inspiration this week:-
“I was living at home in North London and had left school with four o’levels and one A’Level. I needed practical experience to be accepted for an agricultural farm placement. I wanted to live and work animals, but with no experience I had to apply for a farm pupil job. I was interviewed with my mother and was shown round the farm and house as I was to be living in with the farmer and his family. I was given £1 a week and my keep and 1 1/2 days off but I agree that I’d save my day off for six weeks and then come home to London on the tram for a week (train fare was £3 return). Half day was after one on Saturday but back in time for milking at 6 p.m.
Congressman?
None of these horses competed in two recommended international championships.
Maybe a trip to the California “mountains” in a few weeks will help put my system back in check… or maybe I just need to suck it up and enjoy the sunshine and this new season of life ;-)
They’re very particular to a location, the Blue Men - na Fir Ghorma - living only in a strait between the island of Lewis and the Shiants, Sruth nam Fear Gorma - the stream of the Blue Men, aka the Current of Destruction. It’s here they lurk in the waters, looking to capsize boats for no other reason than mischief and pride (at least, unlike the more famous kelpies or water horses, they don’t have any plans to eat you). According to one tale, the only way to outwit them is to be better at rhyming couplets, as proved by a certain captain of a ship with snow-white sails, pursued by na Fear Ghorma:
Arch has somehow wandered into the woods by himself. He doesn't realize it yet, but a pretty aggressive-looking snake is lingering near his feet, waiting to pounce. As he moves around slowly, Arch steps into a trap, and is yanked off of his feet. While he swings around upside-down, the snake raises itself up to strike. Then a mystery figure walks up to Arch, kicks the snake away, and Arch suddenly looks very afraid.
People buy pickup trucks for work or play….and maybe a little of both!
You can prepare everything earlier in the day and keep it grouped together in bowls/tupperware in the fridge. It makes cooking that much easier particularly when an 'adult' meal is something you're aiming for. Therefore washing up a bit later at night isn't going to tip you over the edge.
Of course, the Munchkin still constantly asks me where I'm going, even if I just move from the kitchen to the living room. Here. I am going right here, three feet to your left. Wave.
But… On the whole, April was good – Awareness was raised, even if just one person was educated by every autism parent/carer/individual on the spectrum then surely that is a lot more people more aware than at the start of the month.
And how do you sleep?
but we're not all that fancy here at 10 Rooms, are we?!
Multiplex Communications (US class 370) -- 3.3% of total
The Guardian she brought to life thru a paintbrush, brought her to Mexico on the strongest equinox energy of our lifetimes… and took my little crystal with her… bringing us all back amazing energy, activation’s and understanding. How wonderfully amazing is that!!!
Hey, you know those cool words they make you type when you comment on a blog, the ones that prevent spammers from commenting? If they were real words, what would they mean? See if you can come up with a definition and use it in a sentence.
Locations to host Event Horizon sculptures at elevated heights include: 1 Madison Avenue, 11 Madison Avenue, 41 Madison Avenue, 51 Madison Avenue, 60 Madison Avenue, 15 Madison Square, 1133 Broadway, 225 Fifth Avenue, 204 Fifth Avenue, the Flatiron Building, 304 Park Avenue, 230 Fifth Avenue, 162 Fifth Avenue, 184 Fifth Avenue, 220 East 23rd Street, 928 Broadway, 921 Broadway, 853 Broadway (Union Sq), 245 Fifth Avenue, 11 East 29th Street and the Empire State Building.
There really wasn't anything more to say after that so we just looked at each other.
'We got talking and they invited me down to their local in Rotherhithe. It was packed and there was a very aggressive atmosphere - when people finished their drinks they'd just drop their glasses on the floor, so by the end of the night you were ankle-deep in broken glass. But I got interested in it, so I started shooting pictures. It was very working class and I'm middle class but I can get on with most people and fit in. You just see how people live.'
Yep. It actually works.
At first, that seems like a tough question. There are so many different kinds of writing, so many apparently different standards of excellence. But if we take a practical look at that question, it’s not so difficult to answer. Writers, I tell my students, need to have two main sets of skills: I call them “content skills” and “craft skills.” The content skills are the ones we use to come up with ideas and material for pieces of writing; they include creativity, imagination, and curiosity. Writers also need the ability to establish a natural relationship with readers, so we can transfer our content into their minds. We need craft skills, as well, both an understanding of the “large craft” of how our chosen genre works (a poem does not work the same way as a novel or an op-ed piece) and skill in the “small craft” of choosing words and putting them together into clear, eloquent, and musical sentences.
I very beleatedly thank her for the kind recognition. Things just get away from me sometimes. Now, I need to list 26 things about me in alphabetical order. I chose to blog about 26 places that interest me. And then I need to also pass this award on to 10 people…..(When you accept the award, link to this post).
Tweet:
Beloved, darkness is nothing more than the absence of light, when light comes it fills the darkness and illuminates our way Jn1:5.
Dena Tollefson is one of the best people to have at an opening. Not only does she have a bubbly personality, she is a champ at explaining her process and why she does what she does. Someday, I hope to take a mini class from her.
- Last week Monte Cook announced he was no longer working on the new D&D. I’d be lying if I said this takes away some of the hope I had for the new version; a lot of what I heard and liked came from Monte. But I’m staying positive, and can’t wait to see what he comes out with next.
decloakings effect everything. There is no part of this scenario that
“What’s so funny?” he asked the nearly eight-year-old.
Bryce & Drew are on Winter Break this week. Papa Jim was able to fly down to spend the week with us, but unfortunately, Nana had to work. The highlight of our week was going to The Raccoon Mountain Caverns in Chattanooga, TN.
“Americans don’t like that at all!” she says with a laugh.
What happens at a deposition?
There is not always a good guy. Nor is there always a bad one. Most people are somewhere in between.
Spencer is… working on his bakery… Sorry, can’t say that with a straight face.
Some people think that it takes a certain sort of person to write a book. (Insert mental image of furrowed brows, typewriters and crumpled papers.) I, personally, think anyone can, and should write a book. Sure, it’s a lot of hard work and incredibly time consuming but the payoff is worth it. It’s a great feeling to know that you’ve finished something so few people do.
The Mormon religion teaches quite the opposite of seeking. In fact they do not want you to know about their institution and it is their goal to keep you from finding out about their history, and the fact that they are preaching a different gospel.
Female Market
I am so glad that most of my customer friends would actually trust me to design these toppers and given me the chance to explore.
Why is this suffering so attractive? Why am I writing this?
The average American needs to listen to the words, not just hear the words to these arguments, the name calling, the redefining of issues, the use of language, the use of symbols, and the distortion of facts, by the current string of conservative candidates are meant for specific agendas, factions and constituencies to fill a perceived void that does not exist. It is all propaganda and it is all about getting elected.
“Yes?” she replied, sitting up promptly, taken by surprise by this unexpected intrusion.
This weekend was filled with the usual - work (for Kirk), yard work (for me) all mixed in with a some fun times.
One more thing that caught my eye in Jackson Heights was Kashmiri Tea. I was amazed to see its availability in New York, which I would have never imagined. “You will find everything in US but not Kashmiri tea, so take it along,” my Kashmiri-American friends advised me. But they were wrong, I could have saved a pound of my luggage, had I discarded their advice. Kashmiri Tea is actually salt tea that takes anywhere between four to six hours to make. Till date I have not been able to make Kashmiri tea, although I made a shorter version of it, sweet Kehwa. The availability of Kashmiri Tea in New York made me realize difference between America and New York. My Kashmiri-American friends are based in America and I was lucky to come to New York.
From very early on, Bush made production an inseparable part of
In winter, there is less sunlight hours. Some people can easily get affected by the lack of sunlight. Know yourself and if weather can affect your mood, try not to travel alone during these times.
Thankyou so much for stopping by... feel free to follow and I'll be sure to do the same! =)
Act like a man. Don’t act like a man.
I've got a few more things I'd like to write about, but, for right now, check out the video and tell me your thoughts.
The name Frits Salomonson is not only tied to whitewashing of drugs money. The man was a well known homosexual and pedophile against whom is strong evidence of having raped, brutalized and even tortured young children.
So, I’d like to look at whether listening to contemporary Christian music is a good way to build a strong faith that lasts.
Should libraries that are consolidating remove and/or also consolidate their web sites? At Cornell they haven’t removed the libraries from their web site it seems.
Even in successful TV series, people cut corners to save money.
"And so you make examples out of people who are in this case not compliant with the law. Find people who are not compliant with the law, and you hit them as hard as you can and you make examples out of them, and there is a deterrent effect there. And, companies that are smart see that, they don’t want to play that game, and they decide at that point that it’s time to clean up. And, that won’t happen unless you have somebody out there making examples of people.
The illuminous fifties style microphone is the perfect touch to Hollie Vee and the Hubkaps set, witht he trio racing their way though a classic fifties blues rock performance. All three members of the band are fully absorbed in their set, working with great passion and enjoyment which clearly shows through in each song and spills over into the crowd, causing a brilliant fifties atmosphere. The band are seamless, creating perfect harmonies in very up-beat, enrgetic songs that use great dynamics to enhance the effect of each note played. You don’t even need to close your eyes to be carried away to 1950′s America- this band has somehow brought classic blues rock to 2012, and with an amazing display of twists and riffs, have the modernised sound of the 1950′s down to a T-Bird. Pardon the pun. Sneaking in well rehearsed covers, such as Brand New Cadillac from post-punk band The Clash, Hollie got the crowd on their feet with her great voice and passionate guitar playing. Taking an Amy Winehouse song and completely making it their own got more people up and dancing to the sound of Hollie Vee and the Hubkaps, and after a set filled with modesty, passion and enjoyment, Hollie Vee and the Hupkaps ended their performance on the very high note of Arctic Monkeys classic Bet You Look Good On The Dancefloor. I know for sure I don’t look good on the dancefloor, but Hollie Vee and the Hupkaps most defiantely look good on the stage.
Happy Friday! Thanks for playing along with our Thank You Somethings challenge last week. There sure were some beautiful creations, so many talented crafters out there! Big thanks also to Funky Kits for their continued support of our challenges and their generous prize offerings!
According to Gordon Biersch's co-founder Dan Gordon, “This is a beer unlike any other made before. We designed IPB to pique the curiousity of the IPA drinker, and we hope to capture their palate preference with the unique, authentic flavor that is completely its own.”
If you have taken a chance to check out Strikeforce’s website lately you may notice something a little weird or you have clicked on a wrong link. No, no errors on the page at all. The other day i was browsing some MMA websites for some fighter information and I stumbled upon Strikeforce’s homepage and to my surprise it looked like somebody had typed it up on a word processing app. It’s a single, white page with a banner on top announcing the heavyweight grand prix final between Barnett and Cormier. Besides that picture, which when clicked takes you to purchase a domain name from GoDaddy.com, the rest of the page is in your basic 12 point font stating the other fights on the card that night. The site it very sad, no more high-end graphics, links to click, or videos it can only make one think that this could signal that the end is near..
Byron
As his head slowly emerged from the boiling tub, my friends and I shot giddy glances at each other. It was sort of like he was Jordan Catalano and we were all Angela Chase. He looked across at us, but only for a second, and then got out of the Jacuzzi. As I watched him walk away in his yellow swim trunks, I stated the obvious, “He is so hot.” My friends nodded vehemently in agreement.
Some would have you believe that peak oil was a myth and is no longer a concern now that new types of oil are available in the Athabasca Oil Sands of western Canada, the Green River Shale Formation in Colorado, Utah and Wyoming plus the Orinoco Belt of Venezuela. Joe Carroll wrote this headline for the Bloomberg news service on Feb. 6th 2012 ” Peak Oil Scare Fades as Shale, Deepwater Wells Gush Crude“. He goes on to say “Two decades and four energy crises later, the U.S. Geological Survey estimates that more than 2 trillion barrels of untouched crude is still locked in the ground, enough to last more than 70 years at current rates of consumption”. Whoopie! problem solved, 70 years worth of oil. Tell that to your grandchildren. Oh by the way what is the projected rate of consumption when considering the developing economies of China, India and others?
Then one day the Stock Market dropped to zero.
2 parts lemon or lime juice (I prefer lemon!)
"But no one will agree to legalize it."
This is a relic of the old style and I have to say not a particularly impressive one, despite the budget price of £3.89. There's no vintage on the bottle for a start. It's thin, woody and slightly sour - maybe aged in large oak casks.
Blue Angel - Blue Angel (Polydor 1980..Cyndi Lauper's old band)
1 Plastik - Fads and fables
You probably want to know what the sex is like.
We need a good gang name a stirring, emotive name that’s easy to say and is imbued with hidden verbal power. Like a domesticated ferret, our gang name must have the power to both threaten and comfort the elderly. Having the definite article (for all of you fools out there that means ‘the’) does make you seem bold and definitive, but also risks making you sound like a band from the 1950s. That’s bad, because the Beatles are from the 1950s, and as much as I appreciate their music, they spelt the word ‘beetle’ wrong, and that is unforgivable. I’m thinking ‘Fraternity’ or ‘Collective’. Sounds kind of sci fi. Oooh. Sci fi. Neeow!
In a rare move, Google posted a message at the top of the results page for Michelle Obama distancing itself from the image.
27And there shall in no wise enter into it any thing that defileth, neither whatsoever worketh abomination, or maketh a lie: but they which are written in the Lamb’s book of life.
Survival is selfish.
We finished up the day with dinner at a dockside restaurant where seals played in the water right outside our window. The food was delicious and we had a view of Morro Rock. The couple next to us provided a fun conversation for us to creep on. He was REALLY trying overly hard to impress her and we got a kick out of that. For more info on Hearst Castle, read Marion Davies' biography - The Times We Had. She seems like she was a very sweet person and the tales of living at the Castle are extremely interesting. Did I mention before how much I love Central California?
So we made a couple of water drop offs to houses of pastors in two distinct communities who haven’t sceen much relief come by. Again, we put the pastors in charge of distribution. As community leaders, they were happy to do so and can carry it out in a more peaceful, controlled way. Thanks to cash arriving from a friend of CONASPEH, we were able to also provide the pastors with a little cash in order to buy food to help feed the community. One pastor told us that his tent city hasn’t eaten in 3 days. I pray tonight they at least eat rice.
My sewing muse happened by the studio, I was so excited to see her & show off her inspiration via my work. We're gonna figure out how to do a modern-sewing-bee-esque-scheduled-something at the studio. Contagious!
*you could also make these for a house warming, engagement or wedding present embroidered with things like a heart, the couple's initials, a little house picture, a key, engagement/wedding date, a plant or flower, a cat or dog if they have pets or any other meaningful pictures for the couple.
But how exactly am I supposed to get my life back together if no one is willing to give me a chance? I had the money to pay her. I can't find much else that would have been affordable as this place. The others one that are don't happen to be accessible to mass transit. With my continuing car issues I need to be on a bus line.
A day where things (finally) got done…
Fold half the egg whites into the egg yolk mixture.
Last night I was looking through a hospital chart, and discovered this in another neurologist's note.
Most men hide the fact that they stare at women. I stopped hiding that fact this morning. The neighbor’s daughter decided to give me a glimpse of how wonderful God can manipulate atoms, flesh, bone and skin. The roundness of her curves brought great pleasure to my Morning. At her tender age of 16, she was already a sexual creature to devour or be devoured by. I envied the first to experience her youthful lust and adolescent curiosity. I waved and smiled as I decided to go over and strike up a conversation. She was wearing a light blue tank top and tight white cotton shorts. “Hottie” was written across her ass in pink. You could just make out the fleshy part of her ass check, tempting you to get a closer look.
For both our oars, with little skill,
6. “The world is a better and more just place now that Osama bin Laden is no longer in it. I hope the families of the victims of the September 11th attacks will sleep easier tonight and every night hence knowing that justice has been done.” – Sen. John McCain (R-Ariz.) (May 2011)
There are two twists in this film, one about the general theme and the other character based – I’ve not seen a Sci Fi horror / thriller that had me interested for the whole film in a long time,
Paul: No you blockhead
When the Accidental Father was a small boy, many moons ago, he and a similarly be-shorted school-friend used to pass many happy days hopping between Kings Cross and St Pancras rail stations, trainspotting. The two train stations are united by a common underground stop, with subways facilitating the transfer from one to another; providing a highspeed trainspotting transfer route, if you will. However after the recent heavy redevelopment of both stations, trainspotters have become lesser spotted. St Pancras station, redeveloped first, has becoming a surprising icon of the city, or if that's taking it too far, a rather popular location in the city, given that it is 'just' a train station. A train station which has risen from the ashes more than once, avoiding demolition in the 1960s, and decrepitude in the years that followed.
“Here and Now” begins to redress this balance, using examples to identify ingredients for success, alongside an examination of present day challenges and opportunities.
Romney’s recent “no-Vegas” boast and prep school gay-bashing raise a disturbing question: Why has he, at least since the age of 18, been so hell-bent on mocking, disrupting, hindering, and constraining the lives and civil liberties of gay human beings?
“That is not the way to stop political terrorism,” the statement said. “Instead you are giving law enforcement authorities a pretext for new repressions against underground groups.”
And white stars tell your praise,
forever to be with her
“Ungh … I’m hit,” the man moaned.
Well, that was a question.
Critics of the campaign have argued that the real issue for Scotland is connectivity, not domains. There are still large swathes of the country without access to broadband, and improving this is an important milestone for Scottish commerce. Focusing efforts on a name seems like focusing on the wrong problem. Having said that, there is still a good case for rebranding – it would certainly lend an air of credibility to the country’s online presence. After all, if Antarctica and Liechtenstein have their own domains, why not Scotland? A country that generates £4bn a year in tourism revenues needs to have well crafted websites with a memorable name – www.tourism.scot does have a nice ring to it.
Cho Oyu is a blue point Himalayan and was not born when these pictures were taken. She is happily living in my home and will be two years old in about three months. Maybe someday I'll find a roll of undeveloped film and blog about how wonderful she was.
As soon as I heard January Jones would be the new face of Versace, I was thrilled. She's obviously gorgeous, and having seen her on the red carpet in Versace a number of times now, I had no doubt she would kill the ad campaign.
Persia (Iran) has long been a center of carpet production. Women, and children under women’s guidance, were central to the production of this practical and artistic creation, crucial to the economy as well as the arts in early and modern Iran. Persian carpets are traditionally known for their tremendous variety in design, colour, size, and weave. Moreover, they are known for the uniqueness of each and every rug produced.
Alan Garner: Tigers love pepper… they hate cinnamon.
While the controls complete simple, the bold itself is not–at atomic not anytime so. Navigating the game’s stages is beneath the boxy part; added so, it’s aggravating to accumulate clue of all the assorted Minis. The bold is abnormally agog on you befitting a cord of several Minis affective at once, and admitting you can just as calmly get through a lot of stages abandoned affective one Mini at a time, you won’t annual decidedly top if you don’t accumulate a agglomeration of them traveling simultaneously. Fortunately, it’s simple abundant to move the camera about the level, so you won’t about acquisition yourself disturbing to bulk out beyond your Minis are or beyond they’re headed, and if you can get them all calm into one cord as they adeptness the affiliated exit, you’ll get a nice annual bonus.
Information about the Author: Heidi W. Durrow is a graduate of Stanford, Columbia’s Graduate School of Journalism and Yale Law School.
As his clients cashed in on their concessions, a tropical timber boom ensued and Malaysia outpaced Indonesia as the world’s biggest exporter of tropical timber2. In 1990, the International Tropical Timber Organisation (ITTO) concluded that unless logging was stabilised at a lower level, the state’s forests would be exhausted within a decade3. In fact, after just 8 years in power, Taib had licensed 8.8 million hectares, almost the entirety of Sarawak’s forest for logging4.
And if you're heading to Trafalgar Square this evening to hear the LSO, guess what? The sun is out. Is there nothing that Valery Gergiev can't fix?
Lastly...Colourscape Chunky by Kaffe Fassett. I was quite surprised by this yarn, because anything Kaffe does is generally awesome!
Didn’t I mention earlier that it was more than just a perfect day. Things were just falling in place for us. I never imagined that we will be able to visit all the places marked in my list but we did. Meeting up with a lady at the last minute, not missing even one single route on the way, driving hillside, visiting a craft store to see an egg hatching and what not.
NO!!!! No nooo!!!!
The ribbon is from a pair of laze around pants that I cut off because it was prettier to use for cards and I never tied it up anyway. LOL!! I tell you since the day I bought them I knew exactly where it was all going. In my craft room! LMBO!
Just remember, it’s a choice. He doesn’t make us love Him. He doesn’t make us worship Him. It’s our own choice. Are you willing to live for Him or for earthly things?
I love making liqueurs. Lemon seems like the perfect way to bring in the beginning of spring. Anything citrus works for me this time of year. I have jumped into the cyber world of Limoncello recipes. There are serious opinions about how to make this liqueur. My first shocker that it was highly recommended to use Everclear which is very unavailable, as in illegal to sell, in Pennsylvania. In PA, our alcohol use must be governed because we the people cannot make responsible choices.
When I find a cool place to buy new and fun nerdy tees and accessories - AND when that place actually sells shirts made to fit over *gasp* boobs and not just skinny basement-dweller torsos and Comic Book Guy proportions - my previously oppressed inner geek girl gets pretty excited.
caressed, each dear flesh they’ve known.
The bad thing is that there aren’t thousands of mourners, either. But I like to think that there are one or two puzzled punters out there who are wondering where their weekly fix of Ennerdale Blonde has gone.
I still didn’t like the reflection in the mirror.
1/8 cup of my gluten free blend
Dawn,they don't make half gallons of ice cream anymore.Lise
USA Meat
I told you, as we run through the events that led to this, that I was clueless. Even that Creme Egg I missed to read properly. I posted that because it was just really my first Easter egg. You were fun to be with. You make me laugh a lot and you relieve me of my stress but it didn’t occur to me that we would come to this.
BUBOES have sticky-padded "hands". +8 climb, can cling to ceilings and walls with ease.
And then, on the walk home, I saw this, which really made me happy. I don't know what it is, but it's gorgeous:
Something smells fishy over at lasting Memories. We are challenging you to use some sort of fishy idea this week. It can be as easy as using the word fish or catch of the day to as complicated as attaching fish netting and hooks to your layout. It all up to you and like any good fish story I'm stretching this one. The closest I got to fish on my layout is starfish on my beach layout.
There are many tools that are operated upon electrical components to ensure that they are properly installed. Wire crimpers, screwdrivers, wire strippers, pliers, fish tape and many such small but essential products are included in the list of electrical supplies that are useful for industrial working.
Ms. Macrina Peters
The Hamilton Spectator reported in January that construction on the new bridge would begin in the spring with a June re-opening. They reported that the original bridge was constructed in 1995, and was closed when a main beam collapsed.
I remain at a loss for how to deal with certain students. "I didn't know you wanted us to learn this, I thought we just had to take the notes," one student said to me today. Of course the entire purpose of taking the notes is to help the students learn, and I have -- innumerable times -- explicitly told them that, just as I have explained why I ask them to do each particular task or assignment. Everything I ask them to do is to help them learn, but at this point, I'm left with no alternative but to assume they are being willfully oppositional. Of course that's exhausting, and sad -- they don't trust me, or care enough to try, and that's very hard to deal with.
A former CNN Iraq correspondent suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder says his employers wouldn’t run footage he filmed of what he describes as a war crime by US troops, an Australian news source reports.
I’m not sure of the exact details, but I know the mic cable had wrapped itself around me a couple of times as I scrambled around the stage. I just know that I tried to pull off some type of stage antic and stepped on the cable just as I lurched into a leap. I felt the cable tighten around my neck sharply.
No it doesn't. A neighborhood of single-family houses shared by three generations is a horizontal Brownsville, with almost the same problems of crowding, noise, and traffic.
According to her eye doctor she has perfect vision.
Off lately I haven’t been too blog social.
We have a super sponsor this week
I am beyond excited!
For example, social media coming from Brighton, a Rochester suburb, was abuzz with accounts of dogs left in a dumpster. The people wanted to know about it, so WHAM moved in and got the story.
This rifle, unlike most 98-pattern Mausers, was factory chambered for the U.S. .30 M2 cartridge, better known as .30-06, instead of the European standard 8mm. The reason for this is because after the war, the United States was giving anyone and his dog about as much surplus .30 as they wanted. (We had a lot at the end of the war, and we were nothing if not generous.) Note the small notch cut into the receiver ring below the crest. That's so that the slightly-longer .30 cartridge can be pushed down into the magazine on stripper clips without the bullet tip hanging up on the receiver.
"The referendum is meaningless and unconstitutional," said Borislav Stefanovic, Serbia's negotiator in talks with Pristina.
Then we'll say: ol'Pope is dead
Michaela
7 How Study Abroad Transforms You (couplet-sonnet depicting the Notorious New Zealand Paintball Outing)
Though contemporary designs are certainly more prominent, there are lots of options available within all price ranges and styles, so stop cramming things into non-existent closets and creating sky-high piles. Get organized and enjoy a great night’s sleep!
Now that the semester is over I find myself with the time to work on my three hundred and ten book reading list...I've only read twenty nine of them. I'm kind of in love with books...it's a dangerous relationship (also slightly nerdy...).
that everyone has sometimes been right there.
I can see the future,
Metric1 p.10 - 14
Regarding Medicare, Romney wants to move away from the current fee-for-service reimbursement system and move toward more efficient systems, such as per-person or per-diagnosis plans. But he concedes that this won’t be enough to fix Medicare; it will need a more fundamental alteration (apparently beyond the scope of this book).
335 **10. “Constitutionalism, The Rule of Rules: Explorations.” Brandeis Law Journal, vol. 39, pp. 17-217 (2000). (Sources: Items D-I/30/1976, D-II/1/1980, below, Item C-1986(1), above, Items D-VI/29/1994, D-VI/24/1976, D-IV/23/1976, D-II/22(C)/1988, D-V/27/1986, D-VII/19/1976, D-VIII/21/1999, D-IV/21/1999, below.)
Sabrina Ratté is a Montreal-based video artist. Her work is formed of 2D images and found video footage that is treated with feedback, 3D animation and colour overlays to render a retro-futuristic non-space where only fragments of reality exist in a virtual world of forgotten dreams and consumer-grade nostalgia. We have featured her work before and I can safely say we will feature it again. Because she is one of the best things there is.
Resting
By: Gabriela Gonzalez
According to this news article a Georgia family is displaced by a house fire, the fire department says it was an electrical accident, and the family blames the new Smart Meters installed two weeks ago.
On the other hand, some experts say that your child will grow up into a sensitive, independent, securely-attached genius if only you will practice breastfeeding, baby-wearing, co-sleeping, giving constant praise, gentle discipline, and a few other basic practices.
865,000: Americans That Have Given Up Looking For Work. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, Accessed 4/10/12)
J M Coetzee, Summertime, Random House, Harvill Secker
It is to encourage skepticism, it is to encourage a look on the other side, it is to encourage doubtfulness of objective surveys, polls and statistics.
He played in several traditional Nubian bands and formed his own group which combined Western and traditional Nubian instruments and incorporated outside elements in the traditional Nubian music. Kuban quickly became a star for Nubians throughout Egypt. When he began to sing Arabian texts to Nubian melodies his fame spread to the Egyptian population in general and in the 90’s he began to gain international recognition. - last.fm
At Middle Tennessee, Tyndall helped the Blue Raiders average 17 wins per season while helping to lead them to four consecutive winning seasons. As the recruiting coordinator, Tyndall twice earned MTSU Top 25 recruiting classes in 2003 and 2004. Both classes were also ranked No. 1 in the Sun Belt Conference.
I first read "The Dead" in high school, and as I picked it up again recently I remembered one scene clearly. It's when Gabriel Conroy is looking up the stairs at his wife, Gretta, who has paused on the landing to listen to music being played in another room. I remembered the "panels of her skirt" and the atmosphere of that moment - a woman arrested by music and memory, observed by her husband, who is oblivious to everything but his own feelings of desire and tender possessiveness at the sight of her. He doesn't consider what her own thoughts might be.
which you have prepared in sight of all people,
The dining room has been the hardest part to decorate.....only because there were no window coverings in there...and today I got em up...I got that done...and after that I could see what the room needed. It only took me three hours and a trip to the store to figure it out. So tomorrow I will be ironing them and probably shortening them as well. By the weekend I should have almost every room in this house done.
I painted it in Annie Sloan Pure White and rubbed it smooth. Added some hooks, hung it on the wall, but then decorating it didn't work out the way I expected. I was picturing something rustic and farmhouse-like, but the white coffee mugs I was going to hang on the hooks were too bulky so I swapped out some teacups that I got at auction years ago. The teacups hung beautifully so I dug out the rest of the set. This is every piece I have - 6 cups, 5 saucers, 8 dessert plates, a sugar and creamer, and it fills the shelf nicely, with a pop of color from the little aqua butter dish I picked up at an auction last fall. This looks so pretty against my new paint.
June 24, 2010
Day of Fitness with Gilad Janklowicz and Josh Taylor
Answer the phone every time it rings. - train of thought buster
Thus all the history books were rewritten and Boers with too-long memories such as Robert van Tonder of the Boerestaat Party and Eugene Terre'Blanche (of the incorrectly-named) Afrikaner Weerstandsbeweging were persecuted publicly by the regime, aided and abetted by the Afrikaans-language news media. Eugene's heart is in the right place: he bears the flag of the old Boer Republic and he refers to himself as a Boer. But his organisation's name bears witness to his ethnic confusion, caused by the Afrikaner Broederbond's rewriting of his own history.
* Total Confederate casualties have been estimated to be as great as 28,000. It is usually agreed that total Confederate casualties numbered at least 1/3 of Lee's army.
We have all morning, just the two of us. Sometimes we run errands, sometimes we go to the library, sometimes we go back and snuggle in bed while watching Little Bear tapes. We always read 50,000 books and usually play dolls. She's very cuddly and sweet and I'll miss her when she goes to school.
He opened the door.
ANYWAY!!!
Go to your blog and schedule each of these posts:
At $3 for one, I felt that it's a little on the pricey side considering its size? Frosting's definitely good though. We bought 9 cupcakes in total - have yet to try Red Velvet and Devil's Food/Nutella, they're with the boy! Will update once he tells me about them! (:
Will you not give all of yourself to him?
Tomorrow is Valentine's Day, are you doing anything fun for your family?? I think we'll start off the morning with some pink pancakes, it's kind of a tradition. I wonder if I can get my mom to make them heart shaped sandwiches?!?!!? Too much to ask the free babysitter?? I'll just have to make a special Valentine's dinner...I'm taking suggestions!
Villagers have been promised the play area would be relocated but said there is no other safe area where it could be moved to.
"For many drivers in the Toronto area, there is no reasonable alternative to commuting to work by car," said Cherise Burda, the report's author and director of the institute's transportation program.
12. If you could go back in time which era would you choose, and why?
To the point the point is a clear water crystal illuminating depth
Black Rice
I'm so excited to announce that I just recently was asked to join the Momenta D-Lite team and of course I said YES!!! As soon as I get my papers and stickers, I'll get to scrappin and sharing what I've made! So be on the look out here! :)
Sometimes just when you're least expecting it something happens to give you a lift. It just happened to me when I looked at the comments on my blog tonight and discovered that I'm the lucky winner of a draw. I follow a fantastic blog, Three Dogs in a Garden, that features the most incredibly beautiful photographs of flowers and plants. Jen's blog is a celebration of gardening and gardens and the beauty of the natural world. Recently she held a draw to give away a book called The Untamed Garden, by Sonia Day.
A cooler weather plant, it likes well drained soil and actually adds nitrogen back into it. It is one that is easy to grow, and whose beautiful blossoms are edible.
Ommegang Three Philosophers
After all of last week's political gloom and doom, and then cold and snow, this morning dawned a balmy 38 degrees. I was determined to take my toddler for an early morning walk around town to cheer us up, banish the cabin fever we've both been feeling and hopefully spot the bald eagle I saw near the town wharf a few weeks ago (when I sadly did not have a camera). One thing I love about my town is that I can step out my front door, walk five minutes down the street and be along the river walk.
Until we find the love we missed, we're nothing Alfie
from youtube user Rockstar97321
which was fine . . .
Now that they were separated, I could get down to business.
Some of my nightmares stand as testimony to the price I've paid for my hubris...
Book Received From: Sterling Children's Books for Review
Download and Watch Later
For every doubling of the ISO it doubles the photosensitivety of the sensor (and vice versa by halving the ISO we halve the photosensitivity). For example at 200 ISO we can shoot with a shutter time or an aperture halved compared to those used to take the same picture at 100 ISO.
Hugs and Loves and thanks for reading and looking today ;-)
Ink is Rhubarb Stalk from Memento, a RAK from B.....
Beaulieu is more than a fascinating collection of vehicles; yes there is currently an outstanding selection of James Bond modus operandi and other paraphernalia, but when you go to Beaulieu, you soon realise there is much more to see and do. Reasonable weather helps as some of the attractions are outside, but even so, there’s still plenty to appeal to every family member.
I chose short sleeves instead of the long ones. Elena’s long sleeve design is very “fairy tale” to me, and I think it is really sweet for little girls…but considering I wanted this for the warmer weather accompanied by a cool breeze, the long sleeves seemed too much. There is also a bow embellishment and I toyed with the idea of adding this…but honestly, once I bound off the second sleeve, I was ready for something new.
1/2 cup plus 2 tablespoons sour cream
Mladybrtight - 65
What ticks me off is when people are instantly angry or send hateful e-mails without first trying to understand where I am coming from. I am always open to people contacting me, and using my blog as a forum for a respectful, thoughtful dialogue.
All of this, however, is remarkably by-the-by in the topic of today's post. Which is... girly books! Somewhat of a follow on from my post a couple of days ago about finance books aimed at women, with their blinding pink covers.
of sun against sea water,
Common Sense!
I did not attend any festivals, parties, competitions or celebrations.
Something (not completely) different this time, here's some heavy metal in the vein of Manowar and company from Norseman. The actual monicker they chose to use is fantasy metal and you probably are wondering why am I posting this here as usually traditional metal, thrash and such are left to comrades at Lockjaw and other places. Well, I just am, exceptions happen. I remember seeing this tape in a couple of tape trader lists back in the 90's and idly wondered about it, never actually getting around to have it dubbed for me. Fast forward to last year or year before that and me spotting this in brother Grev's collection, finally deciding to get around to listen to it. Epic backstory. Probably had no cover, if the demo 1995 was actually released it might have one.
Some of my fondest memories of Christmas are of the Christmas of 1963. I was ten years old, and I was in fifth grade. What did I like about that Christmas?
Here is a collection of pretties that I'd like to use: Think ironstone, transferware, silver. My Mother is arriving next week to help with baby. Today she called me to say she scored an amazing deal on some brown English transferware that she'll bring on her carry on luggage. I'm so excited to use it for this project.
Lying down on train rails.
I just picked up the rosary from the post office as we were away for a few days and my mail was being held. I do not know how to express to you my excitement upon opening the box. It is extrodinary and was just what I had in mind. The colors of the crystals are so vibrant and the sterling cross and chalice are just perfect. I absolutely LOVE it, and I am sure that my grandaughter will too. When you ask her what her favorite color is, she will tell you "A Rainbow of Colors" grandma. So I can't wait until she sees her beads. I want to thank you so much for all your help and hard work by creating this SPECIAL gift for me to give to her for her communion!!!
Aliceville – WWII German POW camp – capacity 15,000
For example the lady in front of me went through the medal detector three times. She also had her bags go through the scanny thing, very scientific, I know, three times.
John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2000 Call It A Day (6th), Listen Timmy (PU 17th); 2001 Listen Timmy (PU 16th); 2004 Bear On
Lay warm and dreamy, drowsily
Click on the LINK below to be taken to Ryans article with full instructions.
First I thought I would talk about how uncommon common sense is,
Does anyone have strong feelings as to whether or not I keep blogging?
Meanwhile, heat a large skillet with oil. Add the okra, followed by the scallions and the garlic. Mix well. Add in the corn and the spices. Add the agave nectar (more if you like food sweet; I went shy because I don't like sweet tastes). Saute the veggies until they are tender. Set aside to cool.
them all situated on my page. I will look at frames in the kit first to see if I want to use them. Then I go with papers and get them all situated. Elements come next and then title and journaling. I usually have some kind of idea how I want the LO to look. If I don't, they usually don't turn out as well. I have definitely started over many times because I didn't have a clear vision to begin with. It usually
I do not condone the voices of the far left. I am glad Keith Olbermann was fired from MSNBC and from Current. While I think Rush Limbaugh is a selfish man with very little moral value, I do not think he is the “Worst Person in the World” and think that by attempting to classify him as such, one downplays the truly horrible acts that occur every day. Likewise, to liken the left to a rising Nazi party belittles the horror of the Holocaust, and to associate the left with Nazism is to imply the left is trying to rise up to take over the world and engage in mass genocide—a Fourth Reich, so to speak—which is simply ludicrous. The left—who wants to feed and educate the poor, to heal the sick, to abolish the death penalty, to protect the environment—is not the party of death. They are more pro-life than many foes of abortion.
I completed the large pink circle first and then did the smaller green one. Think they would look quite nice singly with a button or brad for the centre too. Surprising how quickly it all came back to me as I have not done crochet for years. Will certainly be checking out more patterns and designs. So look out for them appearing on a project soon.
Finally they greet the master of the house, Count Dracula himself, who tells them off for wandering around his house uninvited, then helps them call for someone to come pick up their car. I wanted to have him start counting things out, when the family try to give him the phone number à la Count Von Count from Sesame Street, but decided against it. I also wanted to give him pet bats named Grisha, Misha, Sasha, and Tatiana but I was definitely the only one who found this funny. I am trying to coach my boy playing Dracula in speaking with a Russian accent, but given that my Russian is limited to Vodka brands and lines from the film “Anastasia” we aren’t getting that far. This play will (hopefully) end with all my characters joining in for a Thriller dance.
Just then, a high-pitched squeal filled with happiness and delight, sounding so out of place, rang out into the cement courtyard. I looked up and could see a tiny figure struggle to be free from being held, dressed in blue and white, break from the others and run towards me. My heart pounded with recognition, but I found I was afraid to hope. Was it really my little baby bear? Joy filled my heart and tears flooded my eyes as I listened to my baby’s distinctive voice cry out “Me ma me ma me ma,” as her little feet pounded the pavement. She ran into my arms and we embraced. My mate then came up to me as well with tears in his eyes, and hugged us both. “Thank you Jesus!” I whispered under my breath, as I embraced my family once again.
Well, I've been thinking and contemplating what really happened to send me to the hospital again. I try so hard to maintain at home and I don't like to have to visit the ER to get myself taken care of, but I think I've come to the realization now that I do what I have to do. It basically comes down to the point where I can't maintain myself anymore or feel like things are out of control.
Fantastic Four: Rise of the Silver Surfer – Amid the bounty of summer sequels, I think this is the one that the least number of people were asking for. I’ll admit that the first movie was somewhat enjoyable, and it’s always nice to see Michael Chiklis (even when you can’t really see Michael Chiklis), but they had better be strategic about their release date, because I can’t see a single reason why someone would choose to see this over any of the other summer action blockbusters. They can’t even bank on the Chris Evans factor, since he’s in Sunshine, too. Then again, I’m probably forgetting about all of the people who enjoy seeing Jessica Alba in lycra. But can you forge an entire demographic from them?
Honestly... is that beautiful or what? Be still my heart!
Do you remember what Jesus said in John 10:9? It says there:
6:30 PM Evan Biddell “KINGDOM”
You exit the attic and you look around you. As you descend to ground level ("fall off the roof" is the official explanation), you see the gables of the attic windows through the trees to the right. The design is like this:
We enter the gardens surrounding Pembroke Lodge, a stately Georgian mansion once the residence of John Russell, 1st Earl Russell, twice Prime Minister in the mid 19th century, and his son the philosopher Bertrand Russell. Home to GCHQ’s Phantom Squad in the Second World War, the Lodge is now a popular wedding venue, and one such event is under way, smart soldiers in full dress uniform being photographed, as we climb the steps up from the Dell onto the terrace to the west of the house.
The next step is receiving. OS+ will pick up your project in either its entirety or in batches; whichever is easier for you. At this point, we will log, label, and organize your documents in order for scanning. We can even deliver some files while others are in process of being scanned.
Assorted Acrylic and Lucite Cabochon Flowers
Cliff Swallow 2
This was coupled with a secondary statement by Sue Pollock stating:
I canned up 7 quarts, but there are tons more potatoes. The plan is to continue to use the fresh as long as possible and can up whatever looks like it won't make it.
Nuek said that Malaysians must look at politics in the broad sense in that the people must not be narrow in their thinking, because in a country like Malaysia, which is multi-racial , multi-cultural and multi-religious, the people have to co-exist as equal partners.
Yay, they included an explanation for the nickname! I am proud, Mazui.
3/Dev/1/Policy 2011.07.22
Assuming The Voice results airs for the last 6 weeks, the question becomes what does NBC do prior? I can’t imagine they are gonna run a 2 hour Biggest Loser again. I’m not even sure TBL returns in the fall and on Tue. Maybe NBC can get an extra hour of Voice auditions til the results show starts. Tuesday is harder to predict and I assume I will be way off the mark from what actually happens on this night. I don’t think NBC will attempt to go comedy on this night since ABC will have multi cams covered 8-9 and FOX will likely have 4 single cams from 8-10, so I’m thinking that either a 1 hr TBL airs at 8, or maybe NBC airs Parenthood at 8 (and holds TBL til midseason) and uses The Voice results to launch a new drama. Again, I will assume they will try to use The Voice to launch something different/unique. Do No Harm is a Jekyll/Hyde drama, the likes of which is not on TV now and might make a good 10p option or do they go with what sounds like their version of Revenge, called Notorious, which despite an almost exact sounding premise to the former, boasts a terrific cast?
I want you to know all about me,
Thanks for hangin' in there and loving Coleman already!
Did I mention...more love?
Bennett: Well as far as that question is concerned, my answer; there are endless amounts of bands and songs that I never get tired of listening to. But, recently I have been listening to a lot of Deafheaven. A really awesome, ambient/blackmetal/ epic band out of California. They have just been blowing up like crazy the past few months. I for sure recommend a good listen to their stuff! A movie I never get tired of watching...hmmm. Well, I guess I would have to say V For Vendetta. That movies RULES
Bangles: India
“Hopefully his life has touched other people. We hope,” said Scott Shoemake, Holden’s father.
Moses 1:1
So what do we do for those four weeks after the class material has all been taught?
In the abstract, dissent can be the engine of positive change. Ultimately, I’m grateful for the world’s smartasses. I just sometimes wish they’d stay away from me.
A: From a catalogue.
I know there are bunch of versions of faux roman shades, but I wanted one with absolutely no sewing, because for me even a straight line can be tricky. This fit the bill and works great in my space.
And I've been desperate to use my funky feathers since I first saw Rebekah use them, they are from Prima and me being me (unable to part with most of my stash) I had to split them up to use some! The papers are Tim Holtz (something else I struggle to part with) and the postcard stamp is from LOTV.
If you're the same Brigitte Weeks who used to write for Book World, and Guideposts, what the HELL are you doing here??
I can't begin to tell you how much I appreciate the friends I have and all the support they've offered me. And I don't know what I would do without that husband of mine. He has been right there by my side and going above and beyond for my family. He is a treasure. I am so very blessed. So, I'm off to try to bring a little Valentine's Day happiness to my parents. And rumor has it that my Valentine has a special homemade dinner in store for me tonight.
I have been seeking treatment for chronic headaches ever since I was eight. Numerous doctors in various fields have attempted to come to an acceptable explanation for the pain in my head, but to no avail, and I am now committed to avoiding most strenuous activities and sports. I don’t remember what it was like to live without headaches.
Cauterize nerve endings
“We started off slow, our kids were feeling down a little bit, but now we’ve got a good start and we’re going to have a good run this second half.”
Also have our Hawaiian Paddle. Simple name, but it makes sense given the wood is from a tree only found in Hawaii. That's probably our favorite hand picked name.
Semana Santa in Andalucia, it simply magnifies what I have already concluded about the Catholic Church in Spain; it has become an institution of cultural rituals instead of spiritual support and moral guidance. What I find harder to conclude is what it has become for me.
I have something a little different from my usual adorable Magnolia Stamps, this time I have used Fairy Kira from Tickled Pink Stamps. I fell in love with her when I was a DT for TPS, she is one of my all time faves and I thought she would be perfect for this challenge and song choice.
I commit myself to prove to myself and others that human nature can be changed by changing myself into a being that is standing stable in every moment of breath and in all ways considers only what’s best for all life
Tonight Roger Deakins will be honored with the 2011 American Society of Cinematography Lifetime Achievement Award in Los Angeles. It must be odd to win such an award when you’re still in your prime. Nine times he has been nominated for an Oscar for his cinematography including this year for True Grit. Twice his ASC peers have given him top cinematography honors; The Shawshank Redemption and The Man Who Wasn’t There.
One thing I'm contemplating this morning is the deep well of gratitude I have for the wisdom I always possessed, since I was a child, that I wasn't built for motherhood. Never once in all my reproductive years did I wish to be pregnant nor did I long to hold a baby in my arms. Never! Not even for a minute. It's amazing to think about.
Pam looked up at the tall elm trees. At this time of year they should be bare skeletal structures, clear against the pale grey sky. But the ivy had taken them over too, so their trunks were now a dark bushy mass. Their branches had been wrapped round and round, until only a few twigs remained uncovered at the ends, reaching out like beseeching fingers from a swamp, begging to be freed from the enveloping greenness.
Catching up on one of my favorite fashion houses, I’m happy to share my favorites of their 2012 Fall collection.
I decided that I want to start blogging about everything going on in My Life as I Know It! So bear with me because this should be interesting to say the least. It will cover everything from Horses to being a Health Coach to doing cake decorating and a little bit of everything else. So I hope you enjoy the ride!
Kenyans are generally at their best when surrounded by solemnity. High level African officials and business executives expect to be treated with solemnity and respect due to their position. Rank should be respected. When calling in on Kenyans or high rank – a minister or senior official – you should consider bringing along a ranking office of your company or organization in recognition of the African’s senior status.
“Dad, grab a leg!” she told Alex. (Before going into labor, I had demurely planned to ask Alex to stay up by my head, but at that moment, I didn’t care at all.)
I'm only going on what James Watt and the BrewDog spin machine are saying but if it is correct, then it seems a very poor show by Camra.
One of my favourite canapes at this time of year is Blinis and Caviar.
Embellishing is the fun part! Use a paper punch on some white glitter paper, apply some of the alcohol ink from the applicator you have been using on the punches and then adhere carefully to the egg. Add some milliners flowers or other small items like gems or pearls.
Mostly, though, it's because I like to decorate the house in fall and winter. I don't really do much decorating in spring and summer....
essential negativity. . . . The problem of being—the supreme metaphysical problem—emerges from the very beginning as inseparable from the problem of the significance of the demonstrative pronoun, and for this reason it is always already connected with the field of indication . . . Deixis, or indication . . . is the category within which language
Build Your Own Igloo
"Well, I've just found out I'm illiterate."
Bake for 60-75 minutes, or until knife or toothpick inserted into the center comes out clean. Do not open the oven door until the 60 minute mark, or the bread will collapse in the center.
In the baby basket.
A really upscale restaurant here in town serves “smashed” potatoes. Not mashed. Hmmm. Come to find out, they’ve figured out a way that they don’t have to pay their staff to peel potatoes! lol Basically, they just cook red potatoes and mash them with the peels still on them. Actually, it’s healthier for you to eat the peels, so, I suppose that could be their goal.
Side volume keys
The fillum however, is told from the perspective of one girl, Lucy/Sara (Emily Browning). She is narcotised overnight for the anonymous pleasure of several impotent old farts (are YOU talking to ME?). She is completely immobile when asleep, except for a corny scene where, already drugged, she hobbles (poorly acted, patently false) across the room to place a secret camera on a shelf before her oldfartfriend arrives.
4. Once you have that all pinned, you are ready to sew the pocket on. This is important: When sewing the pockets, make sure to over stitch onto the backing piece, and to double stitch. So stitch the lines, making sure to back stitch on both ends, and then go back over and stitch the lines again. This reinforces the pockets since little cars and hands will be going in and out of the pockets often...☻
Here are some pics from the 12 hour crop at Scrapper's Edge on National Scrapbook Day. It was a full classroom and we had fun with the Cinco De Mayo theme. We had a delicious Mexican themed dinner, of course. Prizes were given away every 30 minutes, I even won a stamp pad!
Sorry to be absent. I gave my 16th reading of 2012 on Saturday night in Northampton; my 17th is tonight in Manhattan with Carolita Johnson. I have the first chapter of my novel memorized at this point. You put quarters in my ear, and it comes out my mouth.
FSU’s Aurora Newgard
And this guy, the same guy who flipped tables, and was the epitome of power, knew he was going to die.
Pastors and ministers are experiencing burn-out and discouragement at an alarming rate; and as a result many of them are “retiring” or just quitting the ministry. Where, in Scripture did any Fathers of the Faith retire? No, no….this is worldly wisdom. Sadly, the Church too often subscribes to worldly wisdom rather than seeking the counsel of God.
There have been many things that have made me question the sanity, shall we say, or the good sense of people when it comes what they do with money. Certain agencies of government seem to have no qualms about delegating our dollars to projects and concepts that we ourselves would deem absolute waste. Yet it's like a person gets a position in government and when an absurd idea comes before them they will often say, "Oh that's a ridiculous idea, we should fund this with tax dollars."
Place the dates, water and baking soda in a bowl, mix and allow to stand for 5 minutes. Transfer to a food processor, add the butter and sugar and process until well combined. Add the eggs, one at a time, and process well. Pour over the flour mixture and mix well with a wooden spoon. Pour batter into prepared pan and bake for 30-35 minutes or until risen and cooked when tested with a toothpick. Allow to cool in the pan, then carefully unmold. Cut into squares or diamond shapes and dust with icing sugar to serve.
subtle, endless needles
Initially the district manager bought into everything she complained about. The boss was in hot water. Apparently he had created a hostile work environment in the Worthless Co-Worker's opinion. She complained he, and I for that matter, had been harassing her.
~ He had self-weaned from breastfeeding, but was not drinking from a sippy or any other type of cup. The only fluids he got were what I managed to mix in with his food, and it was a constant source of worry for me that he wasn’t getting enough fluids.
VIVIENNE: The Giver. I read this when I was a teenager, and it changed how I viewed everything. We may all want to live in a perfect world, but at what cost are we willing to make that happen? It was truly life changing for me.
Not only is this book very unique, as I am sure there is only one in existence, but it took me on a journey to locate and find out what happened to the girl who owned this scrapbook. Thinking about this today, I realized I never shared the rest of the story here on my blog. If you'd like to know how the story turned out, come back here on Thursday for Vintage Thingie Thursday and read the (at least to date) last chapter of this treasure hunting experience.
In fact, what began since that day, by way of forcing myself to focus on something/anything else as I drive through that area, has become a somewhat obsessive game of sorts, in which I delight with almost too much glee; driving down that patch of Rt 5 I now focus on “the trophy house” (many frequent drivers of Rt 5 along the Holyoke/Easthampton line will know the teeny house with the trophies in the front window, will know what I mean, instantly) to an unusual degree, calling Billy or Dean to report with awe and wonder that “Trophy Guy” has now moved all his trophies to the other window! Now they are in a circle! Now they are in a square! OMG! Today they are all lying on their side! Maybe he is cleaning? Maybe he no longer bowls and as such does not want them around as a reminder of his bowling days? Whoa, They are back! There is one less today! OMG, I saw “Trophy Guy” walking his dog and he isn’t limping so maybe the one I saw last week which seemed shinier than the others IS new?!
This is my sister Erin, myself and our good friend Molly at church this past Sunday. We have been friends with Molly for a very long time and she is so dear to the both of us. It's been so nice to be worshiping alongside old friends. We love you Molls.
Excerpt: This is just more evidence of Barack Obama wanting to “change” America from a sovereign nation to a third world country in which he ignores the Constitution and seeks to bring the United States under the banner of International Law. It is also evidence that he is willing to sign such an executive order without going through the legislative branch, Congress, which he has shown an extreme contempt for.
For some freakin’ reason, they don’t.
Job 36:21
On a happier note, I thought they no longer made the Scratch N Sniff Valentines, but I did actually find them this year. Unfortunately, Runwild wanted Rapunzel Valentines. But, its ok......I've secretly got the scratch n sniff ones hidden in my night stand. After they go to bed, I'm going to scratch them and sniff them until they are only paper scented ;) Or until Princess Runwilder discovers them and takes them away from me....She's such a bully.
So, next time him indoors rolls over to turn out the light and pauses to call me a bookworm, I’ll remind him the bookworm is dead, here comes the Kindle Katerpiller! Oh and go ahead and turn out the light, The Kindle’s got that covered.
Members of Moravia’s historical society say there’s more than enough Millard Fillmore to go around. Buffalo can claim Grover Cleveland, the 22nd and 24th president, who began his career there. “As a small town, we just have a few moments of history that are ours—and Fillmore is one of them,” says Roger Phillips, president of the Cayuga-Owasco Lakes Historical Society
But the most basic point when it comes to "caring" is that the conservative's respect for the individual and rejection of authoritarianism and arbitrary power is far and away the most important sort of caring. Caring is in fact basic to conservatism in that sense. The connection is perhaps most vividly seen in the thoughts and career of Edmund Burke. Note the following brief excerpts about the origin of Burke's thinking:
Richter said he was stunned. He said his family has eaten the same food forever and flourished.
Love and Hugs
Today, at the ePharma Summit conference, we had the much-anticipated talk by Thomas Abrams, Director of DDMAC/FDA. Tom seems like a nice enough guy and this rant isn’t about him personally. We’d probably enjoy a nice talk over a Samuel Adams Winter Ale. It’s about the monstrosity we were subjected to – an overview of the no-decision-making process of this watchdog of American health, the FDA.
My card features one of my favorite color combos, chocolate brown & light aqua. I stamped the houndstooth background in brown ink Then cut out the window with sizzix framelits. I used the dies to cute the frame out of Tide Layering paper. The inside cream panel is stamped with the envelope pattern in soft pool ink for some more texture. I stamped the sentiment without the scrolls that are part of the stamp so that it would fit inside my frame better. The "YOU" is colored with BG13 Copic with stardust stickles over top.
“Don’t worry, you are safe with us,” a young male nurse reassures me.
Card Recipe: DCWV cardstock
Briana's mom comes in the room and tries to have a conversation. She explains to Bri and D that they have to make it work for the baby's sake. Devon . . . is on his phone! Texting or Facebooking or Tweeting -- basically just being a disrespectful asshole. Show of hands -- who's surprised?
Paul Ehrlich, Bing professor of population studies at Stanford University in California and author of the best-selling Population Bomb book in 1968, goes much further than the Royal Society in London which this morning said that physical numbers were as important as the amount of natural resources consumed.
Not too much booze imbibed on this one, another golden selection of songs from the sixties, seventies, eighties, ninties, naughties and whatever they're calling this decade. Every one lovingly chosen from thee PVC vaults. Agitate, educate, organise.
Carol Denbow: Is your book available at all the typical outlets? Or is your exposure limited?
from their appointments with the slam
you a piece of mind but a must have item that you
Roll your conditioned clay to the desired thickness - I like mine thicker since I like to drill my beading hole from side to side. Roll your leaf gently into the flattened clay.
The missing teeth, of course, are simple, obvious truths, truths available and comprehensible even to ten year-olds, in most cases.
His eyes just beamed at me, and there was nothing to say but yes. I hugged him tight so that he wouldn’t see my tears – tears of joy.
ugh ugh ugh
“Numerous divorces can be traced directly to the day when the wife left the home and went out into the world into employment. Two incomes raise the standard of living beyond its norm. Two spouses working prevent the complete and proper home life, break into the family prayers, create an independence which is not cooperative, causes distortion, limits the family, and frustrates the children already born” (Spencer W. Kimball, San Antonio Fireside, Dec. 3, 1977, pp. 9-10 ).
1. Chop up all vegetables (carrots, celery, and onion are a must) you have on hand/want to put in the soup.
But today, with a swift flick of the wrist, I joyously began several long hours of pipetting. I am a little rusty; it is true. But I am busy again, and that makes me happy.
Other publications like Little Folks achieved a winning balance without succumbing to the sensational tactics of penny thrillers. It was one of the few children's magazines which "at all approach in beauty and general merit the American St. Nicholas or Harper's Young People" (p). Edward Salmon observed, "Boys gain most of their information, apart from what they are taught at school, from the stories that they read. This fact lends a new responsibility to the fiction which is produced for them"(q).
Today she is working towards certification as a massage therapist. She cautions, "Make sure you have a way to make an income. I didn't and it was a hefty price to pay."
Oil paint…what can I say? It really is a glorious medium. I have always adored it. Even in the early stages of using it when I had to try and master blending one color or value into another, avoiding the look of color-block. If one doesn’t blend correctly in ANY media (paint, graphite, etc., the result can be a blatant visual jump from one color or value to the next instead of a natural blend. HATE that! Anyhow, I am mentally AND emotionally…even spiritually…taken in by the richness of and the 3D illusion that oils can give! That house really does appear it is in the distance or his skin appears as though one can actually touch flesh. WOW. And the colors & neutrals (non-colors like white, black, brown) just speak volumes!
the name is painted on metal walls
I'm just feeling random head to toe...
–Author Aaron Levie is the CEO and cofounder of Box.
That's exactly what happened to this young man last night. He was left alone to entertain himself, fend for himself, rationalize his lack of food, and navigate the challenges of structure and rules when he was feeling angry and uncertain. That is hard to do for adults, let alone children. If his mom had been able to put her own oxygen mask on first - to take a step back, clear her mind, take a breath, and think in context from a place of calm rationality - she would have been better equipped to help her child deal with what he was feeling. She did it with her daughter, after all; once her son went to class and she put down her Blackberry, she was much better and more calm.
I decided it looked too stately to paint over it.
Food and entertainment can give much pleasure, and I surely am not debasing enjoyments that uplift spirits, but they are not love.
Yes, this is a lottery. Luck plays a huge part.
sing your own special song,
promising their customers a "no
Interesting to note is the failure of Libya’s former leader Gaddafi’s plan to introduce the gold dinar, a single African currency that would serve as an alternative to the US Dollar and allow African nations to share the wealth, but which like Iraq’s Saddam Hussein “plan” brought a swift and brutal invasion by the Americans and their Western allies to keep it from happening.
Strengths
If the above examples remain unacceptable examples, let us look at a contemporary example from sport, in which the Black Africans’ capability is unquestioned. Castor Semenya won the 800 m at the world championship in Berlin in 2009. An earlier commentary aimed at putting the subsequent furore into objective context.
We don't always celebrate Valentines Day however if we do we tend to do it at home due to babysitting constraints.
And my tale’s, say, the worm’s hind end
Joseph Grzelak, 52, New York, N.Y.
I know I am in the minority, but in a culture crazed for Christmas and Easter, my two favorite church holy-days are Pentecost and Maundy Thursday. I’ll get to Pentecost in about six weeks, but for now I want to think about what makes Maundy Thursday so significant for me.
Tide is giving away 25,000 packs of Tide Stain Release every day! Just watch a quick video, answer a question and if you’re right, you’ll have a chance to receive a free sample. This promotion is only open to those who haven’t received a Tide Stain Release Sample. Each video will be posted on Tide’s Facebook wall on the day of the giveaway.
“…and at the table next to her was a little boy in a soccer uniform sitting with his mother who told him, The plural of elf is elves. A wave of happiness came over me. It felt giddy to be part of it all. To be drinking a cup of coffee like a normal person. I wanted to shout out: The plural of elf is elves! What a language! What a world!“
Indeed, secrecy was very much the order of the day as the colonial government maintained strict control over the media to ensure that only their viewpoint got through to the people. Little was known at the time of the Malayan Emergency’s many flash points like the standoff in Bukit Kepong, Johor, on Feb 23, 1950, between police officers and Communist guerillas that ended with more than 20 fatalities on each side. Across the pond, on Dec 3, 1949, the British governor of Sarawak, Sir Duncan Stewart, was stabbed to death by teenage Malay nationalist Rosli Dhobi.
7.Fold into layers.Roll out the dough 5mm thick.
Captain Fairweather stroked his chin. “I’d rather not make any announcements at this stage, GB. Let’s give the Inspector a chance to investigate first.”
Hello you lot! My blog has not been updating in the dashboard for weeks (despite the posts publishing) and it has been like being sent to Coventry!
Oh...this would be great for All Saints Day....which is ALSO my birthday....no...All Saints Day wasn't named for me...I can see how you'd be confused and think that though! ;)
Jenny steps up, hammers a powerful shot into the back of the net.
I used to pride myself on my use of the English language, my ability to keep in contact with people and my track record of maintaining old friendships. Now, if you're not on Fakebook or texting me back, then we probably haven't been chewing the fat for a long while. Even emails seem too much hard work.
With Borders closing last year and many Barnes and Noble stores shuttering their doors, it seems the big box bookstores are hurtling down the same trail blazed by the brontosaurus, the home phone, and the blue chip NCAA basketball player who graduated from school (i.e. extinction). Maybe instead of trying to cater their book emporiums to the mass audiences, they should have kept in geared towards the endearing and lovable nerds who gladly read on a Saturday night. Say what you will about these noble creatures, they are undeniably loyal to their core beliefs, be it reading, Star Wars, or Tecmo Super Bowl. They won’t desert their passions for the latest trend or blog obsession. They are foundation upon which the economic salvation of the future rests.
and i'm not ready to let go of the baby in him . . . at least not yet.
Another bonus to mention - no fall out!
